Chapter 5
The White Rider
 'My very bones are chilled,' said Gimli, flapping his arms and stamping his feet.
Day had come at last. At dawn the companions had made such breakfast as they
could; now in the growing light they were getting ready to search the ground again
for signs of the hobbits.
 'And do not forget that old man!' said Gimli. 'I should be happier if I could see the
print of a boot.'
 'Why would that make you happy?' said Legolas.
 'Because an old man with feet that leave marks might be no more than he
seemed,' answered the Dwarf.
 'Maybe,' said the Elf; 'but a heavy boot might leave no print here: the grass is deep
and springy.'
 'That would not baffle a Ranger,' said Gimli. 'A bent blade is enough for Aragorn to
read. But I do not expect him to find any traces. It was an evil phantom of Saruman
that we saw last night. I am sure of it, even under the light of morning. His eyes are
looking out on us from Fangorn even now, maybe.'
 56
 'It is likely enough,' said Aragorn; 'yet I am not sure. I am thinking of the horses.
You said last night, Gimli, that they were scared away. But I did not think so. Did you
hear them, Legolas? Did they sound to you like beasts in terror?'
 'No,' said Legolas. 'I heard them clearly. But for the darkness and our own fear I
should have guessed that they were beasts wild with some sudden gladness. They
spoke as horses will when they meet a friend that they have long missed.'
 'So I thought,' said Aragorn; 'but I cannot read the riddle, unless they return. Come!
The light is growing fast. Let us look first and guess later! We should begin here,
near to our own camping-ground, searching carefully all about, and working up the
slope towards the forest. To find the hobbits is our errand, whatever we may think of
our visitor in the night. If they escaped by some chance, then they must have hidden
in the trees, or they would have been seen. If we find nothing between here and the
eaves of the wood, then we will make a last search upon the battle-field and among
the ashes. But there is little hope there: the horsemen of Rohan did their work too
well.'
 For some time the companions crawled and groped upon the ground. The tree
stood mournfully above them, its dry leaves now hanging limp, and rattling in the chill
easterly wind. Aragorn moved slowly away. He came to the ashes of the watch-fire
near the river-bank, and then began to retrace the ground back towards the knoll
where the battle had been fought. Suddenly he stooped and bent low with his face
almost in the grass. Then he called to the others. They came running up.
 'Here at last we find news!' said Aragorn. He lifted up a broken leaf for them to see,
a large pale leaf of golden hue, now fading and turning brown. 'Here is a mallorn-leaf
of Lorien, and there are small crumbs on it, and a few more crumbs in the grass. And
see! there are some pieces of cut cord lying nearby!'
 'And here is the knife that cut them!' said Gimli. He stooped and drew out of a
tussock, into which some heavy foot had trampled it, a short jagged blade. The haft
from which it had been snapped was beside it. 'It was an orc-weapon,' he said,
holding it gingerly, and looking with disgust at the carved handle: it had been shaped
like a hideous head with squinting eyes and leering mouth.
 'Well, here is the strangest riddle that we have yet found!' exclaimed Legolas. 'A
bound prisoner escapes both from the Orcs and from the surrounding horsemen. He
then stops, while still in the open, and cuts his bonds with an orc-knife. But how and
why? For if his legs were tied, how did he walk? And if his arms were tied, how did
he use the knife? And if neither were tied, why did he cut the cords at all? Being
pleased with his skill, he then sat down and quietly ate some waybread! That at least
is enough to show that he was a hobbit, without the mallorn-leaf. After that, I
suppose, he turned his arms into wings and flew away singing into the trees. It
should be easy to find him: we only need wings ourselves!'
 'There was sorcery here right enough,' said Gimli. 'What was that old man doing?
What have you to say, Aragorn, to the reading of Legolas. Can you better it?'
 'Maybe, I could,' said Aragorn, smiling. 'There are some other signs near at hand
that you have not considered. I agree that the prisoner was a hobbit and must have
had either legs or hands free, before he came here. I guess that it was hands,
because the riddle then becomes easier, and also because, as I read the marks, he
was carried to this point by an Orc. Blood was spilled there, a few paces away, orcblood. There are deep
prints of hoofs all about this spot, and signs that a heavy thing
was dragged away. The Orc was slain by horsemen, and later his body was hauled
to the fire. But the hobbit was not seen: he was not "in the open", for it was night and
he still had his elven-cloak. He was exhausted and hungry, and it is not to be
 57
wondered at that, when he had cut his bonds with the knife of his fallen enemy, he
rested and ate a little before he crept away. But it is a comfort to know that he had
some lembas in his pocket, even though he ran away without gear or pack; that,
perhaps, is like a hobbit. I say he, though I hope and guess that both Merry and
Pippin were here together. There is, however, nothing to show that for certain.'
 'And how do you suppose that either of our friends came to have a hand free?'
asked Gimli.
 'I do not know how it happened,' answered Aragorn. 'Nor do I know why an Orc
was carrying them away. Not to help them to escape, we may be sure. Nay, rather I
think that I now begin to understand a matter that has puzzled me from the
beginning: why when Boromir had fallen were the Orcs content with the capture of
Merry and Pippin? They did not seek out the rest of us, nor attack our camp; but
instead they went with all speed towards Isengard. Did they suppose they had
captured the Ring-bearer and his faithful comrade? I think not. Their masters would
not dare to give such plain orders to Orcs, even if they knew so much themselves;
they would not speak openly to them of the Ring: they are not trusty servants. But I
think the Orcs had been commanded to capture hobbits, alive, at all costs. An
attempt was made to slip out with the precious prisoners before the battle. Treachery
perhaps, likely enough with such folk; some large and bold Orc may have been
trying to escape with the prize alone, for his own ends. There, that is my tale. Others
might be devised. But on this we may count in any case: one at least of our friends
escaped. It is our task to find him and help him before we return to Rohan. We must
not be daunted by Fangorn, since need drove him into that dark place.'
 'I do not know which daunts me more: Fangorn, or the thought of the long road
through Rohan on foot,' said Gimli.
 'Then let us go to the forest,' said Aragorn.
 It was not long before Aragorn found fresh signs. At one point, near the bank of the
Entwash, he came upon footprints: hobbit-prints, but too light for much to be made of
them. Then again beneath the bole of a great tree on the very edge of the wood
more prints were discovered. The earth was bare and dry, and did not reveal much.
 'One hobbit at least stood here for a while and looked back; and then he turned
away into the forest,' said Aragorn.
 'Then we must go in, too,' said Gimli. 'But I do not like the look of this Fangorn: and
we were warned against it. I wish the chase had led anywhere else!'
 'I do not think the wood feels evil, whatever tales may say,' said Legolas. He stood
under the eaves of the forest, stooping forward, as if he were listening, and peering
with wide eyes into the shadows. 'No, it is not evil; or what evil is in it is far away. I
catch only the faintest echoes of dark places where the hearts of the trees are black.
There is no malice near us; but there is watchfulness, and anger.'
 'Well, it has no cause to be angry with me,' said Gimli. 'I have done it no harm. '
 'That is just as well,' said Legolas. 'But nonetheless it has suffered harm. There is
something happening inside, or going to happen. Do you not feel the tenseness? It
takes my breath.'
 'I feel the air is stuffy,' said the Dwarf. 'This wood is lighter than Mirkwood, but it is
musty and shabby.'
 'It is old, very old,' said the Elf. 'So old that almost I feel young again, as I have not
felt since I journeyed with you children. It is old and full of memory. I could have been
happy here, if I had come in days of peace.'
 'I dare say you could,' snorted Gimli. 'You are a Wood-elf, anyway, though Elves of
any kind are strange folk. Yet you comfort me. Where you go, I will go. But keep your
 58
bow ready to hand, and I will keep my axe loose in my belt. Not for use on trees,' he
added hastily, looking up at the tree under which they stood. 'I do not wish to meet
that old man at unawares without an argument ready to hand, that is all. Let us go!'
 With that the three hunters plunged into the forest of Fangorn. Legolas and Gimli
left the tracking to Aragorn. There was little for him to see. The floor of the forest was
dry and covered with a drift of leaves; but guessing that the fugitives would stay near
the water, he returned often to the banks of the stream. So it was that he came upon
the place where Merry and Pippin had drunk and bathed their feet. There plain for all
to see were the footprints of two hobbits, one somewhat smaller than the other.
 'This is good tidings,' said Aragorn. 'Yet the marks are two days old, and it seems
that at this point the hobbits left the water-side.'
 'Then what shall we do now?' said Gimli. 'We cannot pursue them through the
whole fastness of Fangorn. We have come ill supplied. If we do not find them soon,
we shall be of no use to them, except to sit down beside them and show our
friendship by starving together.'
 'If that is indeed all we can do, then we must do that,' said Aragorn. 'Let us go on.'
 They came at length to the steep abrupt end of Treebeard's Hill and looked up at
the rock-wall with its rough steps leading to the high shelf. Gleams of sun were
striking through the hurrying clouds, and the forest now looked less grey and drear.
 'Let us go up and look about us!' said Legolas. 'I will feel my breath short. I should
like to taste a freer air for a while.'
 The companions climbed up. Aragorn came last, moving slowly: he was scanning
the steps and ledges closely.
 'I am almost sure that the hobbits have been up here,' he said. 'But there are other
marks, very strange marks, which I do not understand. I wonder if we can see
anything from this ledge which will help us to guess which way they went next?'
 He stood up and looked about, but he saw nothing that was of any use. The shelf
faced southward and eastward; but only on the east was the view open. There he
could see the heads of the trees descending in ranks towards the plain from which
they had come.
 'We have journeyed a long way round,' said Legolas. 'We could have all come here
safe together, if we had left the Great River on the second or third day and struck
west. Few can foresee whither their road will lead them, till they come to its end.'
 59
 'But we did not wish to come to Fangorn,' said Gimli.
 'Yet here we are – and nicely caught in the net,' said Legolas. 'Look!'
 'Look at what?' said Gimli.
 'There in the trees.'
 'Where? I have not elf-eyes.'
 'Hush! Speak more softly! Look!' said Legolas pointing. 'Down in the wood, back in
the Way that we have just come. It is he. Cannot you see him, passing from tree to
tree?'
 'I see, I see now!' hissed Gimli. 'Look, Aragorn! Did I not warn you? There is the old
man. All in dirty grey rags: that is why I could not see him at first.'
 Aragorn looked and beheld a bent figure moving slowly. It was not far away. It
looked like an old beggar-man, walking wearily, leaning on a rough staff. His head
was bowed, and he did not look towards them. In other lands they would have
greeted him with kind words; but now they stood silent, each feeling a strange
expectancy: something was approaching that held a hidden power – or menace.
 Gimli gazed with wide eyes for a while, as step by step the figure drew nearer.
Then suddenly, unable to contain himself longer, he burst out: 'Your bow, Legolas!
Bend it! Get ready! It is Saruman. Do not let him speak, or put a spell upon us! Shoot
first!'
 Legolas took his bow and bent it, slowly and as if some other will resisted him. He
held an arrow loosely in his hand but did not fit it to the string. Aragorn stood silent,
his face was watchful and intent.
 'Why are you waiting? What is the matter with you?' said Gimli in a hissing whisper.
 'Legolas is right,' said Aragorn quietly. 'We may not shoot an old man so, at
unawares and unchallenged, whatever fear or doubt be on us. Watch and wait!'
 At that moment the old man quickened his pace and came with surprising speed to
the foot of the rock-wall. Then suddenly he looked up, while they stood motionless
looking down. There was no sound.
 They could not see his face: he was hooded, and above the hood he wore a widebrimmed hat, so that
all his features were over-shadowed, except for the end of his
nose and his grey beard. Yet it seemed to Aragorn that he caught the gleam of eyes
keen and bright from within the shadow of the hooded brows.
 At last the old man broke the silence. 'Well met indeed, my friends,' he said in a
soft voice. 'I wish to speak to you. Will you come down or shall I come up?' Without
waiting for an answer he began to climb.
 'Now!' said Gimli. 'Stop him, Legolas!'
 'Did I not say that I wished to speak to you?' said the old man. 'Put away that bow,
Master Elf!'
 The bow and arrow fell from Legolas' hands, and his arms hung loose at his sides.
 'And you, Master Dwarf, pray take your hand from your axe-haft, till I am up! You
will not need such arguments.'
 Gimli started and then stood still as stone, staring, while the old man sprang up the
rough steps as nimbly as a goat. All weariness seemed to have left him. As he
stepped up on to the shelf there was a gleam, too brief for certainty, a quick glint of
white, as if some garment shrouded by the grey rags had been for an instant
revealed The intake of Gimli's breath could be heard as a loud hiss in the silence.
 'Well met, I say again!' said the old man, coming towards them. When he was a
few feet away, he stood, stooping over his staff, with his head thrust forward, peering
at them from under his hood. 'And what may you be doing in these parts? An Elf, a
Man, and a Dwarf, all clad in elvish fashion. No doubt there is a tale worth hearing
 60
behind it all. Such things are not often seen here.'
 'You speak as one that knows Fangorn well,' said Aragorn. 'Is that so?'
 'Not well,' said the old man, 'that would be the study of many lives. But I come here
now and again.'
 'Might we know your name, and then hear what it is that you have to say to us?'
said Aragorn. 'The morning passes, and we have an errand that will not wait.'
 'As for what I wished to say, I have said it: what may you be doing, and what tale
can you tell of yourselves? As for my name!' He broke off, laughing long and softly.
Aragorn felt a shudder run through him at the sound, a strange cold thrill; and yet it
was not fear or terror that he felt: rather it was like the sudden bite of a keen air, or
the slap of a cold rain that wakes an uneasy sleeper.
 'My name!' said the old man again. 'Have you not guessed it already? You have
heard it before, I think. Yes, you have heard it before. But come now, what of your
tale?'
 The three companions stood silent and made no answer.
 'There are some who would begin to doubt whether your errand is fit to tell,' said
the old man. 'Happily I know something of it. You are tracking the footsteps of two
young hobbits, I believe. Yes, hobbits. Don't stare, as if you had never heard the
strange name before. You have, and so have I. Well, they climbed up here the day
before yesterday; and they met someone that they did not expect. Does that comfort
you? And now you would like to know where they were taken? Well, well, maybe I
can give you some news about that. But why are we standing? Your errand, you see,
is no longer as urgent as you thought. Let us sit down and be more at ease.'
 The old man turned away and went towards a heap of fallen stones and rock at the
foot of the cliff behind. Immediately, as if a spell had been removed, the others
relaxed and stirred. Gimli's hand went at once to his axe-haft. Aragorn drew his
sword. Legolas picked up his bow.
 The old man took no notice, but stooped and sat himself on a low flat stone. Then
his grey cloak drew apart, and they saw, beyond doubt, that he was clothed beneath
all in white.
 'Saruman!' cried Gimli, springing towards him with axe in hand. 'Speak! Tell us
where you have hidden our friends! What have you done with them? Speak, or I will
make a dint in your hat that even a wizard will find it hard to deal with!'
 The old man was too quick for him. He sprang to his feet and leaped to the top of a
large rock. There he stood, grown suddenly tall, towering above them. His hood and
his grey rags were flung away. His white garments shone. He lifted up his staff, and
Gimli's axe leaped from his grasp and fell ringing on the ground. The sword of
Aragorn, stiff in his motionless hand, blazed with a sudden fire. Legolas gave a great
shout and shot an arrow high into the air: it vanished in a flash of flame.
 'Mithrandir!' he cried. 'Mithrandir!'
 'Well met, I say to you again, Legolas!' said the old man.
 They all gazed at him. His hair was white as snow in the sunshine; and gleaming
white was his robe; the eyes under his deep brows were bright, piercing as the rays
of the sun; power was in his hand. Between wonder, joy, and fear they stood and
found no words to say.
 At last Aragorn stirred. 'Gandalf!' he said. 'Beyond all hope you return to us in our
need! What veil was over my sight? Gandalf!' Gimli said nothing, but sank to his
knees, shading his eyes.
 'Gandalf,' the old man repeated, as if recalling from old memory a long disused
word. 'Yes, that was the name. I was Gandalf.'
 61
 He stepped down from the rock, and picking up his grey cloak wrapped it about
him: it seemed as if the sun had been shining, but now was hid in cloud again. 'Yes,
you may still call me Gandalf,' he said, and the voice was the voice of their old friend
and guide. 'Get up, my good Gimli! No blame to you, and no harm done to me.
Indeed my friends, none of you have any weapon that could hurt me. Be merry! We
meet again. At the turn of the tide. The great storm is coming, but the tide has
turned.'
 He laid his hand on Gimli's head, and the Dwarf looked up and laughed suddenly.
'Gandalf!' he said. 'But you are all in white!'
 'Yes, I am white now,' said Gandalf. 'Indeed I am Saruman, one might almost say,
Saruman as he should have been. But come now, tell me of yourselves! I have
passed through fire and deep water, since we parted. I have forgotten much that I
thought I knew, and learned again much that I had forgotten. I can see many things
far off, but many things that are close at hand I cannot see. Tell me of yourselves!'
 'What do you wish to know?' said Aragorn. 'All that has happened since we parted
on the bridge would be a long tale. Will you not first give us news of the hobbits? Did
you find them, and are they safe?'
 'No, I did not find them,' said Gandalf. 'There was a darkness over the valleys of
the Emyn Muil, and I did not know of their captivity, until the eagle told me.'
 'The eagle!' said Legolas. 'I have seen an eagle high and far off: the last time was
three days ago, above the Emyn Muil.'
 'Yes,' said Gandalf, 'that was Gwaihir the Windlord, who rescued me from Orthanc.
I sent him before me to watch the River and gather tidings. His sight is keen, but he
cannot see all that passes under hill and tree. Some things he has seen, and others I
have seen myself. The Ring now has passed beyond my help, or the help of any of
the Company that set out from Rivendell. Very nearly it was revealed to the Enemy,
but it escaped. I had some part in that: for I sat in a high place, and I strove with the
Dark Tower; and the Shadow passed. Then I was weary, very weary; and I walked
long in dark thought.'
 'Then you know about Frodo!' said Gimli. 'How do things go with him?'
 'I cannot say. He was saved from a great peril, but many lie before him still. He
resolved to go alone to Mordor, and he set out: that is all that I can say.'
 'Not alone,' said Legolas. 'We think that Sam went with him.'
 'Did he!' said Gandalf, and there was a gleam in his eye and a smile on his face.
'Did he indeed? It is news to me, yet it does not surprise me. Good! Very good! You
lighten my heart. You must tell me more. Now sit by me and tell me the tale of your
journey.'
 The companions sat on the ground at his feet, and Aragorn took up the tale. For a
long while Gandalf said nothing, and he asked no questions. His hands were spread
upon his knees, and his eyes were closed. At last when Aragorn spoke of the death
of Boromir and of his last journey upon the Great River, the old man sighed.
 'You have not said all that you know or guess, Aragorn my friend,' he said quietly.
'Poor Boromir! I could not see what happened to him. It was a sore trial for such a
man: a warrior, and a lord of men. Galadriel told me that he was in peril. But he
escaped in the end. I am glad. It was not in vain that the young hobbits came with
us, if only for Boromir's sake. But that is not the only part they have to play. They
were brought to Fangorn, and their coming was like the falling of small stones that
starts an avalanche in the mountains. Even as we talk here, I hear the first
rumblings. Saruman had best not be caught away from home when the dam bursts!'
 'In one thing you have not changed, dear friend,' said Aragorn: 'you still speak in
 62
riddles.'
 'What? In riddles?' said Gandalf. 'No! For I was talking aloud to myself. A habit of
the old: they choose the wisest person present to speak to; the long explanations
needed by the young are wearying.' He laughed, but the sound now seemed warm
and kindly as a gleam of sunshine.
 'I am no longer young even in the reckoning of Men of the Ancient Houses,' said
Aragorn. 'Will you not open your mind more clearly to me?'
 'What then shall I say?' said Gandalf, and paused for a while in thought. 'This in
brief is how I see things at the moment, if you wish to have a piece of my mind as
plain as possible. The Enemy, of course, has long known that the Ring is abroad,
and that it is borne by a hobbit. He knows now the number of our Company that set
out from Rivendell, and the kind of each of us. But he does not yet perceive our
purpose clearly. He supposes that we were all going to Minas Tirith; for that is what
he would himself have done in our place. And according to his wisdom it would have
been a heavy stroke against his power. Indeed he is in great fear, not knowing what
mighty one may suddenly appear, wielding the Ring, and assailing him with war,
seeking to cast him down and take his place. That we should wish to cast him down
and have no one in his place is not a thought that occurs to his mind. That we should
try to destroy the Ring itself has not yet entered into his darkest dream. In which no
doubt you will see our good fortune and our hope. For imagining war he has let loose
war, believing that he has no time to waste; for he that strikes the first blow, if he
strikes it hard enough, may need to strike no more. So the forces that he has long
been preparing he is now setting in motion, sooner than he intended. Wise fool. For
if he had used all his power to guard Mordor, so that none could enter, and bent all
his guild to the hunting of the Ring, then indeed hope would have faded: neither Ring
nor Bearer could long have eluded him. But now his eye gazes abroad rather than
near at home; and mostly he looks towards Minas Tirith. Very soon now his strength
will fall upon it like a storm.
 'For already he knows that the messengers that he sent to waylay the Company
have failed again. They have not found the Ring. Neither have they brought away
any hobbits as hostages. Had they done even so much as that, it would have been a
heavy blow to us, and it might have been fatal. But let us not darken our hearts by
imagining the trial of their gentle loyalty in the Dark Tower. For the Enemy has failed
– so far. Thanks to Saruman:'
 'Then is not Saruman a traitor?' said Gimli.
 'Indeed yes,' said Gandalf. 'Doubly. And is not that strange? Nothing that we have
endured of late has seemed so grievous as the treason of Isengard. Even reckoned
as a lord and captain Saruman has grown very strong. He threatens the Men of
Rohan and draws off their help from Minas Tirith, even as the main blow is
approaching from the East. Yet a treacherous weapon is ever a danger to the hand.
Saruman also had a mind to capture the Ring, for himself, or at least to snare some
hobbits for his evil purposes. So between them our enemies have contrived only to
bring Merry and Pippin with marvellous speed, and in the nick of time, to Fangorn,
where otherwise they would never have come at all!
 'Also they have filled themselves with new doubts that disturb their plans. No
tidings of the battle will come to Mordor, thanks to the horsemen of Rohan; but the
Dark Lord knows that two hobbits were taken in the Emyn Muil and borne away
towards Isengard against the will of his own servants. He now has Isengard to fear
as well as Minas Tirith. If Minas Tirith falls, it will go ill with Saruman.'
 'It is a pity that our friends lie in between,' said Gimli. 'If no land divided Isengard
 63
and Mordor, then they could fight while we watched and waited.'
 'The victor would emerge stronger than either, and free from doubt,' said Gandalf.
'But Isengard cannot fight Mordor, unless Saruman first obtains the Ring. That he will
never do now. He does not yet know his peril. There is much that he does not know.
He was so eager to lay his hands on his prey that he could not wait at home, and he
came forth to meet and to spy on his messengers. But he came too late, for once,
and the battle was over and beyond his help before he reached these parts. He did
not remain here long. I look into his mind and I see his doubt. He has no woodcraft.
He believes that the horsemen slew and burned all upon the field of battle; but he
does not know whether the Orcs were bringing any prisoners or not. And he does not
know of the quarrel between his servants and the Orcs of Mordor; nor does he know
of the Winged Messenger.'
 'The Winged Messenger!' cried Legolas. 'I shot at him with the bow of Galadriel
above Sarn Gebir, and I felled him from the sky. He filled us all with fear. What new
terror is this?'
 'One that you cannot slay with arrows,' said Gandalf. 'You only slew his steed. It
was a good deed; but the Rider was soon horsed again. For he was a Nazgul, one of
the Nine, who ride now upon winged steeds. Soon their terror will overshadow the
last armies of our friends, cutting off the sun. But they have not yet been allowed to
cross the River, and Saruman does not know of this new shape in which the
Ringwraiths have been clad. His thought is ever on the Ring. Was it present in the
battle? Was it found? What if Theoden, Lord of the Mark, should come by it and
learn of its power? That is the danger that he sees, and he has fled back to Isengard
to double and treble his assault on Rohan. And all the time there is another danger,
close at hand, which he does not see, busy with his fiery thoughts. He has forgotten
Treebeard.'
 'Now you speak to yourself again,' said Aragorn with a smile. 'Treebeard is not
known to me. And I have guessed part of Saruman's double treachery; yet I do not
see in what way the coming of two hobbits to Fangorn has served, save to give us a
long and fruitless chase.'
 'Wait a minute!' cried Gimli. 'There is another thing that I should like to know first.
Was it you, Gandalf, or Saruman that we saw last night?'
 'You certainly did not see me,' answered Gandalf, 'therefore I must guess that you
saw Saruman. Evidently we look so much alike that your desire to make an incurable
dent in my hat must be excused.'
 'Good, good!' said Gimli. 'I am glad that it was not you.'
 Gandalf laughed again. 'Yes, my good Dwarf,' he said, 'it is a comfort not to be
mistaken at all points. Do I not know it only too well! But, of course, I never blamed
you for your welcome of me. How could I do so, who have so often counselled my
friends to suspect even their own hands when dealing with the Enemy. Bless you,
Gimli, son of Gloin! Maybe you will see us both together one day and judge between
us!'
 'But the hobbits!' Legolas broke in. 'We have come far to seek them, and you seem
to know where they are. Where are they now?'
 'With Treebeard and the Ents,' said Gandalf.
 'The Ents!' exclaimed Aragorn. 'Then there is truth in the old legends about the
dwellers in the deep forests and the giant shepherds of the trees? Are there still Ents
in the world? I thought they were only a memory of ancient days, if indeed they were
ever more than a legend of Rohan.'
 'A legend of Rohan!' cried Legolas. 'Nay, every Elf in Wilderland has sung songs of
 64
the old Onodrim and their long sorrow. Yet even among us they are only a memory.
If I were to meet one still walking in this world, then indeed I should feel young again!
But Treebeard: that is only a rendering of Fangorn into the Common Speech; yet you
seem to speak of a person. Who is this Treebeard?'
 'Ah! now you are asking much,' said Gandalf. 'The little that I know of his long slow
story would make a tale for which we have no time now. Treebeard is Fangorn, the
guardian of the forest; he is the oldest of the Ents, the oldest living thing that still
walks beneath the Sun upon this Middle-earth. I hope indeed, Legolas, that you may
yet meet him. Merry and Pippin have been fortunate: they met him here, even where
we sit. For he came here two days ago and bore them away to his dwelling far off by
the roots of the mountains. He often comes here, especially when his mind is
uneasy, and rumours of the world outside trouble him. I saw him four days ago
striding among the trees, and I think he saw me, for he paused; but I did not speak,
for I was heavy with thought, and weary after my struggle with the Eye of Mordor;
and he did not speak either, nor call my name.'
 'Perhaps he also thought that you were Saruman,' said Gimli. 'But you speak of
him as if he was a friend. I thought Fangorn was dangerous.'
 'Dangerous!' cried Gandalf. 'And so am I, very dangerous: more dangerous than
anything you will ever meet, unless you are brought alive before the seat of the Dark
Lord. And Aragorn is dangerous, and Legolas is dangerous. You are beset with
dangers, Gimli son of Gloin; for you are dangerous yourself, in your own fashion.
Certainly the forest of Fangorn is perilous-not least to those that are too ready with
their axes; and Fangorn himself, he is perilous too; yet he is wise and kindly
nonetheless. But now his long slow wrath is brimming over, and all the forest is filled
with it. The coming of the hobbits and the tidings that they brought have spilled it: it
will soon be running like a flood; but its tide is turned against Saruman and the axes
of Isengard. A thing is about to happen which has not happened since the Elder
Days: the Ents are going to wake up and find that they are strong.'
 'What will they do?' asked Legolas in astonishment.
 'I do not know,' said Gandalf. 'I do not think they know themselves. I wonder.' He
fell silent, his head bowed in thought.
 The others looked at him. A gleam of sun through fleeting clouds fell on his hands,
which lay now upturned on his lap: they seemed to be filled with light as a cup is with
water. At last he looked up and gazed straight at the sun.
 'The morning is wearing away,' he said. 'Soon we must go.'
 'Do we go to find our friends and to see Treebeard?' asked Aragorn.
 'No,' said Gandalf. 'That is not the road that you must take. I have spoken words of
hope. But only of hope. Hope is not victory. War is upon us and all our friends, a war
in which only the use of the Ring could give us surety of victory. It fills me with great
sorrow and great fear: for much shall be destroyed and all may be lost. I am Gandalf,
Gandalf the White, but Black is mightier still.'
 He rose and gazed out eastward, shading his eyes, as if he saw things far away
that none of them could see. Then he shook his head. 'No,' he said in a soft voice, 'it
has gone beyond our reach. Of that at least let us be glad. We can no longer be
tempted to use the Ring. We must go down to face a peril near despair, yet that
deadly peril is removed.'
 He turned. 'Come, Aragorn son of Arathorn!' he said. 'Do not regret your choice in
the valley of the Emyn Muil, nor call it a vain pursuit. You chose amid doubts the
path that seemed right: the choice was just, and it has been rewarded. For so we
have met in time, who otherwise might have met too late. But the quest of your
 65
companions is over. Your next journey is marked by your given word. You must go to
Edoras and seek out Theoden in his hall. For you are needed. The light of Anduril
must now be uncovered in the battle for which it has so long waited. There is war in
Rohan, and worse evil: it goes ill with Theoden.'
 'Then are we not to see the merry young hobbits again?' said Legolas.
 'I did not say so,' said Gandalf. 'Who knows? Have patience. Go where you must
go, and hope! To Edoras! I go thither also.'
 'It is a long way for a man to walk, young or old,' said Aragorn. 'I fear the battle will
be over long ere I come there.'
 'We shall see, we shall see,' said Gandalf. 'Will you come now with me?'
 'Yes, we will set out together,' said Aragorn. 'But I do not doubt that you will come
there before me, if you wish.' He rose and looked long at Gandalf. The others gazed
at them in silence as they stood there facing one another. The grey figure of the
Man, Aragorn son of Arathorn, was tall, and stern as stone, his hand upon the hilt of
his sword; he looked as if some king out of the mists of the sea had stepped upon
the shores of lesser men. Before him stooped the old figure, white; shining now as if
with some light kindled within, bent, laden with years, but holding a power beyond
the strength of kings.
 'Do I not say truly, Gandalf,' said Aragorn at last, 'that you could go whithersoever
you wished quicker than I? And this I also say: you are our captain and our banner.
The Dark Lord has Nine. But we have One, mightier than they: the White Rider. He
has passed through the fire and the abyss, and they shall fear him. We will go where
he leads.'
 'Yes, together we will follow you,' said Legolas. 'But first, it would ease my heart,
Gandalf, to hear what befell you in Moria. Will you not tell us? Can you not stay even
to tell your friends how you were delivered?'
 'I have stayed already too long,' answered Gandalf. 'Time is short. But if there were
a year to spend, I would not tell you all.'
 'Then tell us what you will, and time allows!' said Gimli. 'Come, Gandalf, tell us how
you fared with the Balrog!'
 'Name him not!' said Gandalf, and for a moment it seemed that a cloud of pain
passed over his face, and he sat silent, looking old as death. 'Long time I fell,' he
said at last, slowly, as if thinking back with difficulty. 'Long I fell, and he fell with me.
His fire was about me. I was burned. Then we plunged into the deep water and all
was dark. Cold it was as the tide of death: almost it froze my heart.'
 'Deep is the abyss that is spanned by Durin's Bridge, and none has measured it,'
said Gimli.
 'Yet it has a bottom, beyond light and knowledge,' said Gandalf. 'Thither I came at
last, to the uttermost foundations of stone. He was with me still. His fire was
quenched, but now he was a thing of slime, stronger than a strangling snake.
 'We fought far under the living earth, where time is not counted. Ever he clutched
me, and ever I hewed him, till at last he fled into dark tunnels. They were not made
by Durin's folk, Gimli son of Gloin. Far, far below the deepest delving of the Dwarves,
the world is gnawed by nameless things. Even Sauron knows them not. They are
older than he. Now I have walked there, but I will bring no report to darken the light
of day. In that despair my enemy was my only hope, and I pursued him, clutching at
his heel. Thus he brought me back at last to the secret ways of Khazad-dum: too
well he knew them all. Ever up now we went, until we came to the Endless Stair.'
 'Long has that been lost,' said Gimli. 'Many have said that it was never made save
in legend, but others say that it was destroyed.'
 66
 'It was made, and it had not been destroyed,' said Gandalf. 'From the lowest
dungeon to the highest peak it climbed, ascending in unbroken spiral in many
thousand steps, until it issued at last in Durin's Tower carved in the living rock of
Zirak-zigil, the pinnacle of the Silvertine.
 'There upon Celebdil was a lonely window in the snow, and before it lay a narrow
space, a dizzy eyrie above the mists of the world. The sun shone fiercely there, but
all below was wrapped in cloud. Out he sprang, and even as I came behind, he burst
into new flame. There was none to see, or perhaps in after ages songs would still be
sung of the Battle of the Peak.' Suddenly Gandalf laughed. 'But what would they say
in song? Those that looked up from afar thought that the mountain was crowned with
storm. Thunder they heard, and lightning, they said, smote upon Celebdil, and
leaped back broken into tongues of fire. Is not that enough? A great smoke rose
about us, vapour and steam. Ice fell like rain. I threw down my enemy, and he fell
from the high place and broke the mountain-side where he smote it in his ruin. Then
darkness took me; and I strayed out of thought and time, and I wandered far on
roads that I will not tell.
 'Naked I was sent back – for a brief time, until my task is done. And naked I lay
upon the mountain-top. The tower behind was crumbled into dust, the window gone;
the ruined stair was choked with burned and broken stone. I was alone, forgotten,
without escape upon the hard horn of the world. There I lay staring upward, while the
stars wheeled over, and each day was as long as a life-age of the earth. Faint to my
ears came the gathered rumour of all lands: the springing and the dying, the song
and the weeping, and the slow everlasting groan of overburdened stone. And so at
the last Gwaihir the Windlord found me again, and he took me up and bore me away.
 '"Ever am I fated to be your burden, friend at need," I said.
 '"A burden you have been," he answered, "but not so now. Light as a swan's
feather in my claw you are. The Sun shines through you. Indeed I do not think you
need me any more: were I to let you fall you would float upon the wind."
 '"Do not let me fall!" I gasped, for I felt life in me again. "Bear me to Lothlorien!"
 '"That indeed is the command of the Lady Galadriel who sent me to look for you,"
he answered.
 'Thus it was that I came to Caras Galadhon and found you but lately gone. I tarried
there in the ageless time of that land where days bring healing not decay. Healing I
found, and I was clothed in white. Counsel I gave and counsel took. Thence by
strange roads I came, and messages I bring to some of you. To Aragorn I was
bidden to say this:
Where now are the Dunedain, Elessar, Elessar?
Why do thy kinsfolk wander afar?
Near is the hour when the Lost should come forth,
And the Grey Company ride from the North.
But dark is the path appointed for thee:
The Dead watch the road that leads to the Sea.
 To Legolas she sent this word:
Legolas Greenleaf long under tree
In joy thou hast lived. Beware of the Sea!
If thou hearest the cry of the gull on the shore,
 67
Thy heart shall then rest in the forest no more.
 Gandalf fell silent and shut his eyes.
 'Then she sent me no message?' said Gimli and bent his head.
 'Dark are her words,' said Legolas, 'and little do they mean to those that receive
them.'
 'That is no comfort,' said Gimli.
 'What then?' said Legolas. 'Would you have her speak openly to you of your
death?'
 'Yes. if she had nought else to say.'
 'What is that?' said Gandalf, opening his eyes. 'Yes, I think I can guess what her
words may mean. Your pardon, Gimli! I was pondering the messages once again.
But indeed she sent words to you, and neither dark nor sad.
 '"To Gimli son of Gloin," she said, "give his Lady's greeting. Lock-bearer, wherever
thou goest my thought goes with thee. But have a care to lay thine axe to the right
tree!"'
 'In happy hour you have returned to us, Gandalf,' cried the Dwarf, capering as he
sang loudly in the strange dwarf-tongue. 'Come, come!' he shouted, swinging his
axe. 'Since Gandalf's head is now sacred, let us find one that it is right to cleave!'
 'That will not be far to seek,' said Gandalf, rising from his seat. 'Come! We have
spent all the time that is allowed to a meeting of parted friends. Now there is need of
haste.'
 He wrapped himself again in his old tattered cloak, and led the way. Following him
they descended quickly from the high shelf and made their way back through the
forest, down the bank of the Entwash. They spoke no more words, until they stood
again upon the grass beyond the eaves of Fangorn. There was no sign of their
horses to be seen.
 'They have not returned,' said Legolas. 'It will be a weary walk!'
 'I shall not walk. Time presses,' said Gandalf. Then lifting up his head he gave a
long whistle. So clear and piercing was the note that the others stood amazed to
hear such a sound come from those old bearded lips. Three times he whistled; and
then faint and far off it seemed to them that they heard the whinny of a horse borne
up from the plains upon the eastern wind. They waited wondering. Before long there
came the sound of hoofs, at first hardly more than a tremor of the ground perceptible
only to Aragorn as he lay upon the grass, then growing steadily louder and clearer to
a quick beat.
 'There is more than one horse coming,' said Aragorn.
 'Certainly,' said Gandalf. 'We are too great a burden for one.'
 'There are three,' said Legolas, gazing out over the plain. 'See how they run! There
is Hasufel, and there is my friend Arod beside him! But there is another that strides
ahead: a very great horse. I have not seen his like before.'
 'Nor will you again,' said Gandalf. 'That is Shadowfax. He is the chief of the
Mearas, lords of horses, and not even Theoden, King of Rohan, has ever looked on
a better. Does he not shine like silver, and run as smoothly as a swift stream? He
has come for me: the horse of the White Rider. We are going to battle together.'
 Even as the old wizard spoke, the great horse came striding up the slope towards
them; his coat was glistening and his mane flowing in the wind of his speed. The two
others followed, now far behind. As soon as Shadowfax saw Gandalf, he checked
his pace and whinnied loudly; then trotting gently forward he stooped his proud head
and nuzzled his great nostrils against the old man's neck.
 68
 Gandalf caressed him. 'It is a long way from Rivendell, my friend,' he said, 'but you
are wise and swift and come at need. Far let us ride now together, and part not in
this world again!'
 Soon the other horses came up and stood quietly by, as if awaiting orders. 'We go
at once to Meduseld, the hall of your master, Theoden,' said Gandalf, addressing
them gravely. They bowed their heads. 'Time presses, so with your leave, my
friends, we will ride. We beg you to use all the speed that you can. Hasufel shall bear
Aragorn and Arod Legolas. I will set Gimli before me, and by his leave Shadowfax
shall bear us both. We will wait now only to drink a little.'
 'Now I understand a part of last night's riddle,' said Legolas as he sprang lightly
upon Arod's back. 'Whether they fled at first in fear, or not, our horses met
Shadowfax, their chieftain, and greeted him with joy. Did you know that he was at
hand, Gandalf?'
 'Yes, I knew,' said the wizard. 'I bent my thought upon him, bidding him to make
haste; for yesterday he was far away in the south of this land. Swiftly may he bear
me back again!'
 Gandalf spoke now to Shadowfax, and the horse set off at a good pace, yet not
beyond the measure of the others. After a little while he turned suddenly, and
choosing a place where the banks were lower, he waded the river, and then led them
away due south into a flat land, treeless and wide. The wind went like grey waves
through the endless miles of grass. There was no sign of road or track, but
Shadowfax did not stay or falter.
 'He is steering a straight course now for the halls of Theoden under the slopes of
the White Mountains,' said Gandalf. 'It will be quicker so. The ground is firmer in the
Eastemnet, where the chief northward track lies, across the river, but Shadowfax
knows the way through every fen and hollow.'
 For many hours they rode on through the meads and riverlands. Often the grass
was so high that it reached above the knees of the riders, and their steeds seemed
to be swimming in a grey-green sea. They came upon many hidden pools, and broad
acres of sedge waving above wet and treacherous bogs; but Shadowfax found the
way, and the other horses followed in his swath. Slowly the sun fell from the sky
down into the West. Looking out over the great plain, far away the riders saw it for a
moment like a red fire sinking into the grass. Low upon the edge of sight shoulders of
the mountains glinted red upon either side. A smoke seemed to rise up and darken
the sun's disc to the hue of blood, as if it had kindled the grass as it passed down
under the rim of earth.
 'There lies the Gap of Rohan,' said Gandalf. 'It is now almost due west of us. That
way lies Isengard.'
 'I see a great smoke,' said Legolas. 'What may that be?'
 'Battle and war!' said Gandalf. 'Ride on!'
Chapter 6
The King of the Golden Hall
 They rode on through sunset, and slow dusk, and gathering night. When at last
they halted and dismounted, even Aragorn was stiff and weary. Gandalf only allowed
them a few hours' rest. Legolas and Gimli slept and Aragorn lay flat, stretched upon
his back; but Gandalf stood, leaning on his staff, gazing into the darkness, east and
west. All was silent, and there was no sign or sound of living thing. The night was
barred with long clouds, fleeting on a chill wind, when they arose again. Under the
 69
cold moon they went on once more, as swift as by the light of day.
 Hours passed and still they rode on. Gimli nodded and would have fallen from his
seat, if Gandalf had not clutched and shaken him. Hasufel and Arod, weary but
proud, followed their tireless leader, a grey shadow before them hardly to he seen.
The miles went by. The waxing moon sank into the cloudy West.
 A bitter chill came into the air. Slowly in the East the dark faded to a cold grey. Red
shafts of light leapt above the black walls of the Emyn Muil far away upon their left.
Dawn came clear and bright; a wind swept across their path, rushing through the
bent grasses. Suddenly Shadowfax stood still and neighed. Gandalf pointed ahead.
 'Look!' he cried, and they lifted their tired eyes. Before them stood the mountains of
the South: white-tipped and streaked with black. The grass-lands rolled against the
hills that clustered at their feet, and flowed up into many valleys still dim and dark,
untouched by the light of dawn, winding their way into the heart of the great
mountains. Immediately before the travellers the widest of these glens opened like a
long gulf among the hills. Far inward they glimpsed a tumbled mountain-mass with
one tall peak; at the mouth of the vale there stood like sentinel a lonely height. About
its feet there flowed, as a thread of silver, the stream that issued from the dale; upon
its brow they caught, still far away, a glint in the rising sun, a glimmer of gold. 'Speak,
Legolas!' said Gandalf. 'Tell us what you see there before us!'
 Legolas gazed ahead, shading his eyes from the level shafts of the new-risen sun.
'I see a white stream that comes down from the snows,' he said. 'Where it issues
from the shadow of the vale a green hill rises upon the east. A dike and mighty wall
and thorny fence encircle it. Within there rise the roofs of houses; and in the midst,
set upon a green terrace, there stands aloft a great hall of Men. And it seems to my
eyes that it is thatched with gold. The light of it shines far over the land. Golden, too,
are the posts of its doors. There men in bright mail stand; but all else within the
courts are yet asleep.'
 'Edoras those courts are called,' said Gandalf, 'and Meduseld is that golden hall.
There dwells Theoden son of Thengel, King of the Mark of Rohan. We are come with
the rising of the day. Now the road lies plain to see before us. But we must ride more
warily; for war is abroad, and the Rohirrim, the Horse-lords, do not sleep, even if it
seem so from afar. Draw no weapon, speak no haughty word, I counsel you all, until
we are come before Theoden's seat.'
 The morning was bright and clear about them, and birds were singing, when the
travellers came to the stream. It ran down swiftly into the plain, and beyond the feet
of the hills turned across their path in a wide bend, flowing away east to feed the
Entwash far off in its reed-choked beds. The land was green: in the wet meads and
along the grassy borders of the stream grew many willow-trees. Already in this
southern land they were blushing red at their fingertips, feeling the approach of
spring. Over the stream there was a ford between low banks much trampled by the
passage of horses. The travellers passed over and came upon a wide rutted track
leading towards the uplands.
 70
 At the foot of the walled hill the way ran under the shadow of many mounds, high
and green. Upon their western sides the grass was white as with a drifted snow:
small flowers sprang there like countless stars amid the turf.
 'Look!' said Gandalf. 'How fair are the bright eyes in the grass! Evermind they are
called, simbelmyne in this land of Men, for they blossom in all the seasons of the
year, and grow where dead men rest. Behold! we are come to the great barrows
where the sires of Theoden sleep.'
 'Seven mounds upon the left, and nine upon the right,' said Aragorn. 'Many long
lives of men it is since the golden hall was built.'
 'Five hundred times have the red leaves fallen in Mirkwood in my home since then,'
said Legolas, 'and but a little while does that seem to us.'
 'But to the Riders of the Mark it seems so long ago,' said Aragorn, 'that the raising
of this house is but a memory of song, and the years before are lost in the mist of
time. Now they call this land their home, their own, and their speech is sundered
from their northern kin.' Then he began to chant softly in a slow tongue unknown to
the Elf and Dwarf; yet they listened, for there was a strong music in it.
 'That, I guess, is the language of the Rohirrim,' said Legolas; 'for it is like to this
land itself; rich and rolling in part, and else hard and stern as the mountains. But I
cannot guess what it means, save that it is laden with the sadness of Mortal Men.'
 'It runs thus in the Common Speech,' said Aragorn, 'as near as I can make it.
Where now the horse and the rider? Where is the horn that was blowing?
Where is the helm and the hauberk, and the bright hair flowing?
Where is the hand on the harpstring, and the red fire glowing?
Where is the spring and the harvest and the tall corn growing?
They have passed like rain on the mountain, like a wind in the meadow;
The days have gone down in the West behind the hills into shadow.
Who shall gather the smoke of the dead wood burning,
Or behold the flowing years from the Sea returning?
 Thus spoke a forgotten poet long ago in Rohan, recalling how tall and fair was Eorl
the Young, who rode down out of the North; and there were wings upon the feet of
his steed, Felarof, father of horses. So men still sing in the evening.'
 71
 With these words the travellers passed the silent mounds. Following the winding
way up the green shoulders of the hills, they came at last to the wide wind-swept
walls and the gates of Edoras.
 There sat many men in bright mail, who sprang at once to their feet and barred the
way with spears. 'Stay, strangers here unknown!' they cried in the tongue of the
Riddermark, demanding the names and errand of the strangers. Wonder was in their
eyes but little friendliness; and they looked darkly upon Gandalf.
 'Well do I understand your speech,' he answered in the same language; 'yet few
strangers do so. Why then do you not speak in the Common Tongue, as is the
custom in the West, if you wish to be answered?'
 'It is the will of Theoden King that none should enter his gates, save those who
know our tongue and are our friends,' replied one of the guards. 'None are welcome
here in days of war but our own folk, and those that come from Mundburg in the land
of Gondor. Who are you that come heedless over the plain thus strangely clad, riding
horses like to our own horses? Long have we kept guard here, and we have watched
you from afar. Never have we seen other riders so strange, nor any horse more
proud than is one of these that bear you. He is One of the Mearas, unless our eyes
are cheated by some spell. Say, are you not a wizard, some spy from Saruman, or
phantoms of his craft? Speak now and be swift!'
 'We are no phantoms,' said Aragorn, 'nor do your eyes cheat you. For indeed these
are your own horses that we ride, as you knew well are you asked, I guess. But
seldom does thief ride home to the stable. Here are Hasufel and Arod, that Eomer,
the Third Marshal of the Mark, lent to us, only two days ago. We bring them back
now, even as we promised him. Has not Eomer then returned and given warning of
our coming?'
 A troubled look came into the guard's eyes. 'Of Eomer I have naught to say,' he
answered. 'If what you tell me is truth, then doubtless Theoden will have heard of it.
Maybe your coming was not wholly unlooked-for. It is but two nights ago that
Wormtongue came to us and said that by the will of Theoden no stranger should
pass these gates.'
 'Wormtongue?' said Gandalf, looking sharply at the guard. 'Say no more! My
errand is not to Wormtongue, but to the Lord of the Mark himself. I am in haste. Will
you not go or send to say that we are come?' His eyes glinted under his deep brows
as he bent his gaze upon the man.
 'Yes, I will go,' he answered slowly. 'But what names shall I report? And what shall
I say of you? Old and weary you seem now, and yet you are fell and grim beneath, I
deem.'
 'Well do you see and speak,' said the wizard. 'For I am Gandalf. I have returned.
And behold! I too bring back a horse. Here is Shadowfax the Great, whom no other
hand can tame. And here beside me is Aragorn son of Arathorn, the heir of Kings,
and it is to Mundburg that he goes. Here also are Legolas the Elf and Gimli the
Dwarf, our comrades. Go now and say to your master that we are at his gates and
would have speech with him, if he will permit us to come into his hall.'
 'Strange names you give indeed! But I will report them as you bid and learn my
master's will,' said the guard. 'Wait here a little while, and I will bring you such
answer as seems good to him. Do not hope too much! These are dark days.' He
went swiftly away, leaving the strangers in the watchful keeping of his comrades.
After some time he returned. 'Follow me!' he said. 'Theoden gives you leave to enter;
but any weapon that you bear; be it only a staff, you must leave on the threshold.
The doorwardens will keep them.'
 72
 The dark gates were swung open. The travellers entered, walking in file behind
their guide. They found a broad path, paved with hewn stones, now winding upward,
now climbing in short flights of well-laid steps. Many houses built of wood and many
dark doors they passed. Beside the way in a stone channel a stream of clear water
flowed, sparkling and chattering. At length they came to the crown of the hill. There
stood a high platform above a green terrace, at the foot of which a bright spring
gushed from a stone carved in the likeness of a horse's head; beneath was a wide
basin from which the water. spilled and fed the falling stream. Up the green terrace
went a stair of stone, high and broad, and on either side of the topmost step were
stone-hewn sea, There sat other guards, with drawn swords laid upon their knees.
Their golden hair was braided on their shoulders the sun was blazoned upon their
green shields, their long corslets were burnished bright, and when they rose taller
they seemed than mortal men.
'There are the doors before you,' said the guide. 'I must return now to my duty at
the gate. Farewell! And may the Lord of the Mark be gracious to you!'
 He turned and went swiftly back down the road. The others climbed the long stair
under the eyes of the tall watchmen. Silent they stood now above and spoke no
word, until Gandalf stepped out upon the paved terrace at the stairs head. Then
suddenly with clear voices they spoke a courteous greeting in their own tongue.
 'Hail, comers from afar!' they said, and they turned the hilts of their swords towards
the travellers in token of peace. Green gems flashed in the sunlight. Then one of the
guards stepped forward and spoke in the Common Speech.
 'I am the Doorward of Theoden,' he said. 'Hama is my name. Here I must bid you
lay aside your weapons before you enter.'
 Then Legolas gave into his hand his silver-hafted knife, his quiver and his bow.
'Keep these well,' he said, 'for they come from the Golden Wood and the Lady of
Lothlorien gave them to me.'
 Wonder came into the man's eyes, and he laid the weapons hastily by the wall, as
if he feared to handle them. 'No man will touch them I promise you,' he said.
 Aragorn stood a while hesitating. 'It is not my will,' he said, 'to put aside my sword
or to deliver Anduril to the hand of any other man.'
 'It is the will of Theoden,' said Hama.
 'It is not clear to me that the will of Theoden son of Thengel even though he be lord
of the Mark, should prevail over the will of Aragorn son of Arathorn, Elendil's heir of
Gondor.'
 'This is the house of Theoden, not of Aragorn, even were he King of Gondor in the
seat of Denethor,' said Hama, stepping swiftly before the doors and barring the way.
His sword was now in his hand and the point towards the strangers.
 'This is idle talk,' said Gandalf. 'Needless is Theoden's demand, but it is useless to
refuse. A king will have his way in his own hall, be it folly or wisdom.'
 'Truly,' said Aragorn. 'And I would do as the master of the house bade me, were
this only a woodman's cot, if I bore now any sword but Anduril.'
 'Whatever its name may be,' said Hama, 'here you shall lay it, if you would not fight
alone against all the men in Edoras.'
 'Not alone!' said Gimli, fingering the blade of his axe, and looking darkly up at the
guard, as if he were a young tree that Gimli had a mind to fell. 'Not alone!'
 'Come, come!' said Gandalf. 'We are all friends here. Or should be; for the laughter
of Mordor will be our only reward, if we quarrel. My errand is pressing. Here at least
is my sword, goodman Hama. Keep it well. Glamdring it is called, for the Elves made
it long ago. Now let me pass. Come, Aragorn!'
 73
 Slowly Aragorn unbuckled his belt and himself set his sword upright against the
wall. 'Here I set it,' he said, 'but I command you not to touch it, nor to permit any
other to lay hand on it. In this elvish heath dwells the Blade that was Broken and has
been made again. Telchar first wrought it in the deeps of time. Death shall come to
any man that draws Elendil's sword save Elendil's heir.'
 The guard stepped back and looked with amazement on Aragorn. 'It seems that
you are come on the wings of song out of the forgotten days he said. It shall be, lord,
as you command.'
 'Well,' said Gimli, 'if it has Anduril to keep it company, my axe may stay here, too,
without shame,' and he laid it on the floor. 'Now then, if all is as you wish, let us go
and speak with your master.'
 The guard still hesitated. 'Your staff,' he said to Gandalf. 'Forgive me, but that too
must be left at the doors.'
 'Foolishness!' said Gandalf. 'Prudence is one thing, but discourtesy is another. I am
old. If I may not lean on my stick as I go, then I will sit out here, until it pleases
Theoden to hobble out himself to speak with me.'
 Aragorn laughed. 'Every man has something too dear to trust to another. But would
you part an old man from his support? Come, will you not let us enter?'
 'The staff in the hand of a wizard may be more than a prop for age,' said Hama. He
looked hard at the ash-staff on which Gandalf leaned. 'Yet in doubt a man of worth
will trust to his own wisdom. I believe you are friends and folk worthy of honour, who
have no evil purpose. You may go in.'
 The guards now lifted the heavy bars of the doors and swung them slowly inwards
grumbling on their great hinges. The travellers entered. Inside it seemed dark and
warm after the clear air upon the hill. The hall was long and wide and filled with
shadows and half lights; mighty pillars upheld its lofty roof. But here and there bright
sunbeams fell in glimmering shafts from the eastern windows, high under the deep
eaves. Through the louver in the roof, above the thin wisps of issuing smoke, the sky
showed pale and blue. As their eyes changed, the travellers perceived that the floor
was paved with stones of many hues; branching runes and strange devices
intertwined beneath their feet. They saw now that the pillars were richly carved,
gleaming dully with gold and half-seen colours. Many woven cloths were hung upon
the walls, and over their wide spaces marched figures of ancient legend, some dim
with years, some darkling in the shade. But upon one form the sunlight fell: a young
man upon a white horse. He was blowing a great horn, and his yellow hair was flying
in the wind. The horse's head was lifted, and its nostrils were wide and red as it
neighed, smelling battle afar. Foaming water, green and white, rushed and curled
about its knees.
 'Behold Eorl the Young!' said Aragorn. 'Thus he rode out of the North to the Battle
of the Field of Celebrant.'
 Now the four companions went forward, past the clear wood-fire burning upon the
long hearth in the midst of the hall. Then they halted. At the far end of the house,
beyond the hearth and facing north towards the doors, was a dais with three steps;
and in the middle of the dais was a great gilded chair. Upon it sat a man so bent with
age that he seemed almost a dwarf; but his white hair was long and thick and fell in
great braids from beneath a thin golden circle set upon his brow. In the centre upon
his forehead shone a single white diamond. His beard was laid like snow upon his
knees; but his eyes still burned with a bright light, glinting as he gazed at the
strangers. Behind his chair stood a woman clad in white. At his feet upon the steps
sat a wizened figure of a man, with a pale wise face and heavy-lidded eyes.
 74
 There was a silence. The old man did not move in his chair. At length Gandalf
spoke. 'Hail, Theoden son of Thengel! I have returned. For behold! the storm comes,
and now all friends should gather together, lest each singly be destroyed.'
 Slowly the old man rose to his feet, leaning heavily upon a short black staff with a
handle of white bone; and now the strangers saw that, bent though he was, he was
still tall and must in youth have been high and proud indeed.
 'I greet you,' he said, 'and maybe you look for welcome. But truth to tell your
welcome is doubtful here, Master Gandalf. You have ever been a herald of woe.
Troubles follow you like crows, and ever the oftener the worse. I will not deceive you:
when I heard that Shadowfax had come back riderless, I rejoiced at the return of the
horse, but still more at the lack of the rider; and when Eomer brought the tidings that
you had gone at last to your long home, I did not mourn. But news from afar is
seldom sooth. Here you come again! And with you come evils worse than before, as
might be expected. Why should I welcome you, Gandalf Stormcrow? Tell me that.'
Slowly he sat down again in his chair.
 'You speak justly, lord,' said the pale man sitting upon the steps of the dais. 'It is
not yet five days since the bitter tidings came that Theodred your son was slain upon
the West Marches: your right hand, Second Marshal Of the Mark. In Eomer there is
little trust. Few men would be left to guard your walls, if he had been allowed to rule.
And even now we learn from Gondor that the Dark Lord is stirring in the East. Such
is the hour in which this wanderer chooses to return. Why indeed should we
welcome you, Master Stormcrow? Lathspell I name you, Ill-news; and ill news is an
ill guest they say.' He laughed grimly, as he lifted his heavy lids for a moment and
gazed on the strangers with dark eyes.
 'You are held wise, my friend Wormtongue, and are doubtless a great support to
your master,' answered Gandalf in a soft voice. 'Yet in two ways may a man come
with evil tidings. He may be a worker of evil; or he may be such as leaves well alone,
and comes only to bring aid in time of need.'
 'That is so,' said Wormtongue; 'but there is a third kind: pickers of bones, meddlers
in other men's sorrows, carrion-fowl that grow fat on war. What aid have you ever
brought, Stormcrow? And what aid do you bring now? It was aid from us that you
sought last time that you were here. Then my lord bade you choose any horse that
you would and be gone; and to the wonder of all you took Shadowfax in your
insolence. My lord was sorely grieved; yet to some it seemed that to speed you from
the land the price was not too great. I guess that it is likely to turn out the same once
more: you will seek aid rather than render it. Do you bring men? Do you bring
horses, swords, spears? That I would call aid; that is our present need. But who are
these that follow at your tail? Three ragged wanderers in grey, and you yourself the
most beggar-like of the four!'
 'The courtesy of your hall is somewhat lessened of late, Theoden son of Thengel,'
said Gandalf. 'Has not the messenger from your gate reported the names of my
companions? Seldom has any lord of Rohan received three such guests. Weapons
they have laid at your doors that are worth many a mortal man, even the mightiest.
Grey is their raiment, for the Elves clad them, and thus they have passed through the
shadow of great perils to your hall.'
 'Then it is true, as Eomer reported, that you are in league with the Sorceress of the
Golden Wood?' said Wormtongue. 'It is not to be wondered at: webs of deceit were
ever woven in Dwimordene.'
 Gimli strode a pace forward, but felt suddenly the hand of Gandalf clutch him by
the shoulder, and he halted, standing stiff as stone.
 75
In Dwimordene, in Lorien
Seldom have walked the feet of Men,
Few mortal eyes have seen the light
That lies there ever, long and bright.
Galadriel! Galadriel!
Clear is the water of your well;
White is the star in your white hand;
Unmarred, unstained is leaf and land
In Dwimordene, in Lorien
More fair than thoughts of Mortal Men.
 Thus Gandalf softly sang, and then suddenly he changed. Casting his tattered
cloak aside, he stood up and leaned no longer on his staff; and he spoke in a clear
cold voice. 'The wise speak only of what they know, Grima son of Galmod. A witless
worm have you become. Therefore be silent, and keep your forked tongue behind
your teeth. I have not passed through fire and death to bandy crooked words with a
serving-man till the lightning falls.' He raised his staff. There was a roll of thunder.
The sunlight was blotted out from the eastern windows; the whole hall became
suddenly dark as night. The fire faded to sullen embers. Only Gandalf could be seen,
standing white and tall before the blackened hearth.
 In the gloom they heard the hiss of Wormtongue's voice: 'Did I not counsel you,
lord, to forbid his staff? That fool, Hama, has betrayed us!' There was a flash as if
lightning had cloven the roof. Then all was silent. Wormtongue sprawled on his face.
 'Now Theoden son of Thengel, will you hearken to me?' said Gandalf. 'Do you ask
for help?' He lifted his staff and pointed to a high window. There the darkness
seemed to clear, and through the opening could be seen, high and far, a patch of
shining sky. 'Not all is dark. Take courage, Lord of the Mark; for better help you will
not find. No counsel have I to give to those that despair. Yet counsel I could give,
and words I could speak to you. Will you hear them? They are not for all ears. I bid
you come out before your doors and look abroad. Too long have you sat in shadows
and trusted to twisted tales and crooked promptings.'
 Slowly Theoden left his chair. A faint light grew in the hall again. The woman
hastened to the king's side, taking his arm, and with faltering steps the old man came
down from the dais and paced softly through the hall. Wormtongue remained lying
on the floor. They came to the doors and Gandalf knocked.
 'Open!' he cried. 'The Lord of the Mark comes forth!'
 The doors rolled back and a keen air came whistling in. A wind was blowing on the
hill. 'Send your guards down to the stairs foot,' said Gandalf. 'And you, lady, leave
him a while with me. I will care for him.'
 'Go, Eowyn sister-daughter!' said the old king. 'The time for fear is past.'
 The woman turned and went slowly into the house. As she passed the doors she
turned and looked back. Grave and thoughtful was her glance, as she looked on the
king with cool pity in her eyes. Very fair was her face, and her long hair was like a
river of gold. Slender and tall she was in her white robe girt with silver; but strong she
seemed and stern as steel, a daughter of kings. Thus Aragorn for the first time in the
full light of day beheld Eowyn, Lady of Rohan, and thought her fair, fair and cold, like
a morning of pale spring that is not yet come to womanhood. And she now was
suddenly aware of him: tall heir of kings, wise with many winters, greycloaked.
Hiding a power that yet she felt. For a moment still as stone she stood, then turning
 76
swiftly she was gone.
 'Now, lord,' said Gandalf, 'look out upon your land! Breathe the free air again!'
 From the porch upon the top of the high terrace they could see beyond the stream
the green fields of Rohan fading into distant grey. Curtains of wind-blown rain were
slanting down. The sky above and to the west was still dark with thunder, and
lightning far away flickered among the tops of hidden hills. But the wind had shifted
to the north, and already the storm that had come out of the East was receding,
rolling away southward to the sea. Suddenly through a rent in the clouds behind
them a shaft of sun stabbed down. The falling showers gleamed like silver, and far
away the river glittered like a shimmering glass.
 'It is not so dark here,' said Theoden.
 'No,' said Gandalf. 'Nor does age lie so heavily on your shoulders as some would
have you think. Cast aside your prop!'
 From the king's hand the black staff fell clattering on the stones. He drew himself
up, slowly, as a man that is stiff from long bending over some dull toil. Now tall and
straight he stood, and his eyes were blue as he looked into the opening sky.
 'Dark have been my dreams of late,' he said, 'but I feel as one new-awakened. I
would now that you had come before, Gandalf. For I fear that already you have come
too late, only to see the last days of my house. Not long now shall stand the high hall
which Brego son of Eorl built. Fire shall devour the high seat. What is to be done?'
 'Much,' said Gandalf. 'But first send for Eomer. Do I not guess rightly that you hold
him prisoner, by the counsel of Grima, of him that all save you name the
Wormtongue?'
 'It is true,' said Theoden. 'He had rebelled against my commands, and threatened
death to Grima in my hall.'
 'A man may love you and yet not love Wormtongue or his counsels,' said Gandalf.
 'That may be. I will do as you ask. Call Hama to me. Since he proved untrusty as a
doorward, let him become an errand-runner. The guilty shall bring the guilty to
judgement,' said Theoden, and his voice was grim, yet he looked at Gandalf and
smiled and as he did so many lines of care were smoothed away and did not return.
 When Hama had been summoned and had gone, Gandalf led Theoden to a stone
seat, and then sat himself before the king upon the topmost stair. Aragorn and his
companions stood nearby.
 'There is no time to tell all that you should hear,' said Gandalf. 'Yet if my hope is
not cheated, a time will come ere long when I can speak more fully. Behold! you are
come into a peril greater even than the wit of Wormtongue could weave into your
dreams. But see! you dream no longer. You live. Gondor and Rohan do not stand
alone. The enemy is strong beyond our reckoning, yet we have a hope at which he
has not guessed.'
 Quickly now Gandalf spoke. His voice was low and secret, and none save the king
heard what he said. But ever as he spoke the light shone brighter in Theoden's eye,
and at the last he rose from his seat to his full height, and Gandalf beside him, and
together they looked out from the high place towards the East.
 'Verily,' said Gandalf, now in a loud voice, keen and clear, 'that way lies our hope,
where sits our greatest fear. Doom hangs still on a thread. Yet hope there is still, if
we can but stand unconquered for a little while.'
 The others too now turned their eyes eastward. Over the sundering leagues of
land, far away they gazed to the edge of sight, and hope and fear bore their thoughts
still on, beyond dark mountains to the Land of Shadow. Where now was the Ringbearer? How thin
indeed was the thread upon which doom still hung! It seemed to
 77
Legolas, as he strained his farseeing eyes, that he caught a glint of white: far away
perchance the sun twinkled on a pinnacle of the Tower of Guard. And further still,
endlessly remote and yet a present threat, there was a tiny tongue of flame.
 Slowly Theoden sat down again, as if weariness still struggled to master him
against the will of Gandalf. He turned and looked at his great house. 'Alas!' he said,
'that these evil days should be mine, and should come in my old age instead of that
peace which I have earned. Alas for Boromir the brave! The young perish and the
old linger, withering.' He clutched his knees with his wrinkled hands.
 'Your fingers would remember their old strength better, if they grasped a swordhilt,' said Gandalf.
 Theoden rose and put his hand to his side; but no sword hung at his belt. 'Where
has Grima stowed it?' he muttered under his breath.
 'Take this, dear lord!' said a clear voice. 'It was ever at your service.' Two men had
come softly up the stair and stood now a few steps from the top. Eomer was there.
No helm was on his head, no mail was on his breast, but in his hand he held a drawn
sword; and as he knelt he offered the hilt to his master.
 'How comes this?' said Theoden sternly. He turned towards Eomer and the men
looked in wonder at him, standing now proud and erect. Where was the old man
whom they had left crouching in his chair or leaning on his stick?
 'It is my doing, lord,' said Hama, trembling. I understood that Eomer was to be set
free. Such joy was in my heart that maybe I have erred. Yet, since he was free
again, and he a Marshal of the Mark, I brought him his sword as he bade me.'
 'To lay at your feet, my lord,' said Eomer.
 For a moment of silence Theoden stood looking down at Eomer as he knelt still
before him. Neither moved.
 'Will you not take the sword?' said Gandalf.
 Slowly Theoden stretched forth his hand. As his fingers took the hilt, it seemed to
the watchers that firmness and strength returned to his thin arm. Suddenly he lifted
the blade and swung it shimmering and whistling in the air. Then he gave a great cry.
His voice rang clear as he chanted in the tongue of Rohan a call to arms.
Arise now, arise, Riders of Theoden!
Dire deeds awake, dark is it eastward.
Let horse be bridled, horn be sounded!
Forth Eorlingas!
 The guards, thinking that they were summoned, sprang up the stair. They looked
at their lord in amazement, and then as one man they drew their swords and laid
them at his feet. 'Command us!' they said.
 'Westu Theoden hal!' cried Eomer. 'It is a joy to us to see you return into your own.
Never again shall it be said, Gandalf, that you come only with grief!'
 'Take back your sword, Eomer, sister-son!' said the king. 'Go, Hama, and seek my
own sword! Grima has it in his keeping. Bring him to me also. Now, Gandalf, you
said that you had counsel to give, if I would hear it. What is your counsel?'
 'You have yourself already taken it,' answered Gandalf. 'To put your trust in Eomer,
rather than in a man of crooked mind. To cast aside regret and fear. To do the deed
at hand. Every man that can ride should be sent west at once, as Eomer counselled
you: we must first destroy the threat of Saruman, while we have time. If we fail, we
fall. If we succeed – then we will face the next task. Meanwhile your people that are
left, the women and the children and the old, should stay to the refuges that you
 78
have in the mountains. Were they not prepared against just such an evil day as this?
Let them take provision, but delay not, nor burden themselves with treasures, great
or small. It is their lives that are at stake.'
 'This counsel seems good to me now,' said Theoden. 'Let all my folk get ready! But
you my guests – truly you said, Gandalf, that the courtesy of my hall is lessened.
You have ridden through the night, and the morning wears away. You have had
neither sleep nor food. A guest-house shall be made ready: there you shall sleep,
when you have eaten.'
 'Nay, lord,' said Aragorn. 'There is no rest yet for the weary. The men of Rohan
must ride forth today, and we will ride with them, axe, sword, and bow. We did not
bring them to rest against your wall, Lord of the Mark. And I promised Eomer that my
sword and his should be drawn together.'
 'Now indeed there is hope of victory!' said Eomer.
 'Hope, yes,' said Gandalf. 'But Isengard is strong. And other perils draw ever
nearer. Do not delay, Theoden, when we are gone. Lead your people swiftly to the
Hold of Dunharrow in the hills!'
 'Nay, Gandalf!' said the king. 'You do not know your own skill in healing. It shall not
be so. I myself will go to war, to fall in the front of the battle, if it must be. Thus shall I
sleep better.'
 'Then even the defeat of Rohan will be glorious in song,' said Aragorn. The armed
men that stood near clashed their weapons, crying: 'The Lord of the Mark will ride!
Forth Eorlingas!'
 'But your people must not be both unarmed and shepherdless,' said Gandalf. 'Who
shall guide them and govern them in your place?'
 'I will take thought for that ere I go,' answered Theoden. 'Here comes my
counsellor.'
 At that moment Hama came again from the hall. Behind him cringing between two
other men, came Grima the Wormtongue. His face was very white. His eyes blinked
in the sunlight. Hama knelt and presented to Theoden a long sword in a scabbard
clasped with gold and set with green gems. 'Here, lord, is Herugrim, your ancient
blade,' he said. 'It was found in his chest. Loth was he to render up the keys. Many
other things are there which men have missed.'
 'You lie,' said Wormtongue. 'And this sword your master himself gave into my
keeping.'
 'And he now requires it of you again,' said Theoden. 'Does that displease you?'
 'Assuredly not, lord,' said Wormtongue. 'I care for you and yours as best I may. But
do not weary yourself, or tax too heavily your strength. Let others deal with these
irksome guests. Your meat is about to be set on the board. Will you not go to it?'
 'I will,' said Theoden. 'And let food for my guests be set on the board beside me.
The host rides today. Send the heralds forth! Let them summon all who dwell nigh!
Every man and strong lad able to bear arms, all who have horses, let them be ready
in the saddle at the gate ere the second hour from noon!'
 'Dear lord!' cried Wormtongue. 'It is as I feared. This wizard has bewitched you.
Are none to be left to defend the Golden Hall of your fathers, and all your treasure?
None to guard the Lord of the Mark?'
 'If this is bewitchment,' said Theoden, 'it seems to me more wholesome than your
whisperings. Your leechcraft ere long would have had me walking on all fours like a
beast. No, not one shall be left, not even Grima. Grima shall ride too. Go! You have
yet time to clean the rust from your sword.'
 'Mercy, lord!' whined Wormtongue, grovelling on the ground. 'Have pity on one
 79
worn out in your service. Send me not from your side! I at least will stand by you
when all others have gone. Do not send your faithful Grima away!'
 'You have my pity,' said Theoden. 'And I do not send you from my side. I go myself
to war with my men. I bid you come with me and prove your faith.'
 Wormtongue looked from face to face. In his eyes was the hunted look of a beast
seeking some gap in the ring of his enemies. He licked his lips with a long pale
tongue. 'Such a resolve might be expected from a lord of the House of Eorl, old
though he be,' he said. 'But those who truly love him would spare his failing years.
Yet I see that I come too late. Others, whom the death of my lord would perhaps
grieve less, have already persuaded him. If I cannot undo their work, hear me at
least in this, lord! One who knows your mind and honours your commands should be
left in Edoras. Appoint a faithful steward. Let your counsellor Grima keep all things till
your return – and I pray that we may see it, though no wise man will deem it hopeful.'
 Eomer laughed. 'And if that plea does not excuse you from war, most noble
Wormtongue,' he said, what office of less honour would you accept? To carry a sack
of meal up into the mountains – if any man would trust you with it?'
 'Nay, Eomer, you do not fully understand the mind of Master Wormtongue,' said
Gandalf, turning his piercing glance upon him. 'He is bold and cunning. Even now he
plays a game with peril and wins a throw. Hours of my precious time he has wasted
already. 'Down snake!' he said suddenly in a terrible voice. 'Down on your belly! How
long is it since Saruman bought you? What was the promised price? When all the
men were dead, you were to pick your share of the treasure, and take the woman
you desire? Too long have you watched her under your eyelids and haunted her
steps.'
 Eomer grasped his sword. 'That I knew already,' he muttered. 'For that reason I
would have slain him before, forgetting the law of the hall. But there are other
reasons.' He stepped forward, but Gandalf stayed him with his hand.
 'Eowyn is safe now,' he said. 'But you, Wormtongue, you have done what you
could for your true master. Some reward you have earned at least. Yet Saruman is
apt to overlook his bargains. I should advise you to go quickly and remind him, lest
he forget your faithful service.'
 'You lie,' said Wormtongue.
 'That word comes too oft and easy from your lips,' said Gandalf. 'I do not lie. See,
Theoden, here is a snake! With safety you cannot take it with you, nor can you leave
it behind. To slay it would be just. But it was not always as it now is. Once it was a
man, and did you service in its fashion. Give him a horse and let him go at once,
wherever he chooses. By his choice you shall judge him.'
 'Do you hear this, Wormtongue?' said Theoden. 'This is your choice: to ride with
me to war, and let us see in battle whether you are true; or to go now, whither you
will. But then, if ever we meet again, I shall not be merciful.'
 Slowly Wormtongue rose. He looked at them with half-closed eyes. Last of all he
scanned Theoden's face and opened his mouth as if to speak. Then suddenly he
drew himself up. His hands worked. His eyes glittered. Such malice was in them that
men stepped back from him. He bared his teeth; and then with a hissing breath he
spat before the king's feet, and darting to one side, he fled down the stair.
 'After him!' said Theoden. 'See that he does no harm to any, but do not hurt him or
hinder him. Give him a horse, if he wishes it.'
'And if any will bear him,' said Eomer.
 One of the guards ran down the stair. Another went to the well at the foot of the
terrace and in his helm drew water. With it he washed clean the stones that
 80
Wormtongue had defiled.
 'Now my guests, come!' said Theoden. 'Come and take such refreshment as haste
allows.'
 They passed back into the great house. Already they heard below them in the town
the heralds crying and the war-horns blowing. For the king was to ride forth as soon
as the men of the town and those dwelling near could be armed and assembled.
 At the king's board sat Eomer and the four guests, and there also waiting upon the
king was the lady Eowyn. They ate and drank swiftly. The others were silent while
Theoden questioned Gandalf concerning Saruman.
 'How far back his treachery goes, who can guess?' said Gandalf. 'He was not
always evil. Once I do not doubt that he was the friend of Rohan; and even when his
heart grew colder, he found you useful still. But for long now he has plotted your ruin,
wearing the mask of Friendship, until he was ready. In those years Wormtongue's
task was easy, and all that you did was swiftly known in Isengard; for your land was
open, and strangers came and went. And ever Wormtongue's whispering was in your
ears, poisoning your thought, chilling your heart, weakening your limbs, while others
watched and could do nothing, for your will was in his keeping.
 'But when I escaped and warned you, then the mask was torn, for those who would
see. After that Wormtongue played dangerously, always seeking to delay you, to
prevent your full strength being gathered. He was crafty: dulling men's wariness, or
working on their fears, as served the occasion. Do you not remember how eagerly
he urged that no man should be spared on a wildgoose chase northward, when the
immediate peril was westward? He persuaded you to forbid Eomer to pursue the
raiding Orcs. If Eomer had not defied Wormtongue's voice speaking with your mouth,
those Orcs would have reached Isengard by now, bearing a great prize. Not indeed
that prize which Saruman desires above all else, but at the least two members of my
Company, sharers of a secret hope, of which even to you, lord, I cannot yet speak
openly. Dare you think of what they might now be suffering, or what Saruman might
now have learned to our destruction?'
 'I owe much to Eomer,' said Theoden. 'Faithful heart may have forward tongue.'
 'Say also,' said Gandalf, 'that to crooked eyes truth may wear a wry face.'
 'Indeed my eyes were almost blind,' said Theoden. 'Most of all I owe to you, my
guest. Once again you have come in time. I would give you a gift ere we go, at your
own choosing. You have only to name aught that is mine. I reserve now only my
sword!'
 'Whether I came in time or not is yet to be seen,' said Gandalf. 'But as for your gift,
lord, I will choose one that will fit my need: swift and sure. Give me Shadowfax! He
was only lent before, if loan we may call it. But now shall ride him into great hazard,
setting silver against black: I would not risk anything that is not my own. And already
there is a bond of love between us.'
 'You choose well,' said Theoden; 'and I give him now gladly. Yet it is a great gift.
There is none like to Shadowfax. In him one of the mighty steeds of old has returned.
None such shall return again. And to you my other guests I will offer such things as
may be found in my armoury. Swords you do not need, but there are helms and
coats of mail of cunning work, gifts to my fathers out of Gondor. Choose from these
ere we go, and may they serve you well!'
 Now men came bearing raiment of war from the king's hoard and they arrayed
Aragorn and Legolas in shining mail. Helms too they chose, and round shields: their
bosses were overlaid with gold and set with gems, green and red and white. Gandalf
took no armour; and Gimli needed no coat of rings, even if one had been found to
 81
match his stature, for there was no hauberk in the hoards of Edoras of better make
than his short corslet forged beneath the Mountain in the North. But he chose a cap
of iron and leather that fitted well upon his round head; and a small shield he also
took. It bore the running horse, white upon green, that was the emblem of the House
of Eorl.
 'May it keep you well!' said Theoden. 'It was made for me in Thengel's day, while
still I was a boy.'
 Gimli bowed. 'I am proud, Lord of the Mark, to bear your device,' he said. 'Indeed
sooner would I bear a horse than be borne by one. I love my feet better. But, maybe,
I shall come yet where I can stand and fight.'
 'It may well be so,' said Theoden.
 The king now rose, and at once Eowyn came forward bearing wine. 'Ferthu
Theoden hal!' she said. 'Receive now this cup and drink in happy hour. Health be
with thee at thy going and coming!'
 Theoden drank from the cup, and she then proffered it to the guests. As she stood
before Aragorn she paused suddenly and looked upon him, and her eyes were
shining. And he looked down upon her fair face and smiled; but as he took the cup,
his hand met hers, and he knew that she trembled at the touch. 'Hail Aragorn son of
Arathorn!' she said. 'Hail Lady of Rohan!' he answered, but his face now was
troubled and he did not smile.
 When they had all drunk, the king went down the hall to the doors. There the
guards awaited him, and heralds stood, and all the lords and chiefs were gathered
together that remained in Edoras or dwelt nearby.
 'Behold! I go forth, and it seems like to be my last riding,' said Theoden. 'I have no
child. Theodred my son is slain. I name Eomer my sister-son to be my heir. If neither
of us return, then choose a new lord as you will. But to someone I must now entrust
my people that I leave behind, to rule them in my place. Which of you will stay?'
 No man spoke.
 'Is there none whom you would name? In whom do my people trust?'
 'In the House of Eorl,' answered Hama.
 'But Eomer I cannot spare, nor would he stay,' said the king, 'and he is the last of
that House.'
 'I said not Eomer,' answered Hama. 'And he is not the last. There is Eowyn,
daughter of Eomund, his sister. She is fearless and high-hearted. All love her. Let
her be as lord to the Eorlingas, while we are gone.'
 'It shall be so,' said Theoden. 'Let the heralds announce to the folk that the Lady
Eowyn will lead them!'
 Then the king sat upon a seat before his doors, and Eowyn knelt before him and
received from him a sword and a fair corslet. 'Farewell sister-daughter!' he said.
'Dark is the hour, yet maybe we shall return to the Golden Hall. But in Dunharrow the
people may long defend themselves, and if the battle go ill, thither will come all who
escape.'
 'Speak not so!' she answered. 'A year shall I endure for every day that passes until
your return.' But as she spoke her eyes went to Aragorn who stood nearby.
'The king shall come again,' he said. 'Fear not! Not West but East does our doom
await us.'
 The king now went down the stair with Gandalf beside him. The others followed.
Aragorn looked back as they passed towards the gate. Alone Eowyn stood before
the doors of the house at the stair's head; the sword was set upright before her, and
her hands were laid upon the hilt. She was clad now in mail and shone like silver in
 82
the sun.
 Gimli walked with Legolas, his axe on his shoulder. 'Well, at last we set off!' he
said. 'Men need many words before deeds. My axe is restless in my hands. Though I
doubt not that these Rohirrim are fell-handed when they come to it. Nonetheless this
is not the warfare that suits me. How shall I come to the battle? I wish I could walk
and not bump like a sack at Gandalf's saddlebow.'
 'A safer seat than many, I guess,' said Legolas. 'Yet doubtless Gandalf will gladly
put you down on your feet when blows begin; or Shadowfax himself. An axe is no
weapon for a rider.'
 'And a Dwarf is no horseman. It is orc-necks I would hew, not shave the scalps of
Men,' said Gimli, patting the haft of his axe.
 At the gate they found a great host of men, old and young, all ready in the saddle.
More than a thousand were there mustered. Their spears were like a springing
wood. Loudly and joyously they shouted as Theoden came forth. Some held in
readiness the king's horse, Snowmane, and others held the horses of Aragorn and
Legolas. Gimli stood ill at ease, frowning, but Eomer came up to him, leading his
horse.
 'Hail, Gimli Gloin's son!' he cried. 'I have not had time to learn gentle speech under
your rod, as you promised. But shall we not put aside our quarrel? At least I will
speak no evil again of the Lady of the Wood.'
 'I will forget my wrath for a while, Eomer son of Eomund,' said Gimli, 'but if ever
you chance to see the Lady Galadriel with your eyes, then you shall acknowledge
her the fairest of ladies, or our friendship will end.'
 'So be it!' said Eomer. 'But until that time pardon me, and in token of pardon ride
with me, I beg. Gandalf will be at the head with the Lord of the Mark; but Firefoot, my
horse, will bear us both, if you will.'
 'I thank you indeed,' said Gimli greatly pleased. 'I will gladly go with you, if Legolas,
my comrade, may ride beside us.'
 'It shall be so,' said Eomer. 'Legolas upon my left, and Aragorn upon my right, and
none will dare to stand before us!'
 'Where is Shadowfax?' said Gandalf.
 'Running wild over the grass,' they answered. 'He will let no man handle him. There
he goes, away down by the ford, like a shadow among the willows.'
 Gandalf whistled and called aloud the horse's name, and far away he tossed his
head and neighed, and turning sped towards the host like an arrow.
 'Were the breath of the West Wind to take a body visible, even so would it appear,'
said Eomer, as the great horse ran up, until he stood before the wizard.
 'The gift seems already to be given,' said Theoden. 'But hearken all! Here now I
name my guest, Gandalf Greyhame, wisest of counsellors; most welcome of
wanderers, a lord of the Mark, a chieftain of the Eorlingas while our kin shall last; and
I give to him Shadowfax, prince of horses.'
 'I thank you, Theoden King,' said Gandalf. Then suddenly he threw back his grey
cloak, and cast aside his hat, and leaped to horseback. He wore no helm nor mail.
His snowy hair flew free in the wind, his white robes shone dazzling in the sun.
 'Behold the White Rider!' cried Aragorn, and all took up the words.
 'Our King and the White Rider!' they shouted. 'Forth Eorlingas!'
 The trumpets sounded. The horses reared and neighed. Spear clashed on shield.
Then the king raised his hand, and with a rush like the sudden onset of a great wind
the last host of Rohan rode thundering into the West. Far over the plain Eowyn saw
 83
the glitter of their spears, as she stood still, alone before the doors of the silent
house.
Chapter 7
Helm's Deep
 The sun was already westering as they rode from Edoras, and the light of it was in
their eyes, turning all the rolling fields of Rohan to a golden haze. There was a
beaten way, north-westward along the foot-hills of the White Mountains, and this
they followed, up and down in a green country, crossing small swift streams by many
fords. Far ahead and to their right the Misty Mountains loomed; ever darker and taller
they grew as the miles went by. The sun went slowly down before them. Evening
came behind.
 The host rode on. Need drove them. Fearing to come too late, they rode with all
the speed they could, pausing seldom. Swift and enduring were the steeds of Rohan,
but there were many leagues to go. Forty leagues and more it was, as a bird flies,
from Edoras to the fords of the Isen, where they hoped to find the king's men that
held back the hosts of Saruman.
 Night closed about them. At last they halted to make their camp. They had ridden
for some five hours and were far out upon the western plain, yet more than half their
journey lay still before them. In a great circle, under the starry sky and the waxing
moon, they now made their bivouac. They lit no fires, for they were uncertain of
events; but they set a ring of mounted guards about them, and scouts rode out far
ahead, passing like shadows in the folds of the land. The slow night passed without
tidings or alarm. At dawn the horns sounded, and within an hour they took the road
again.
 There were no clouds overhead yet, but a heaviness was in the air; it was hot for
the season of the year. The rising sun was hazy, and behind it, following it slowly up
the sky, there was a growing darkness, as of a great storm moving out of the East.
And away in the North-west there seemed to be another darkness brooding about
the feet of the Misty Mountains, a shadow that crept down slowly from the Wizard's
Vale.
 Gandalf dropped back to where Legolas rode beside Eomer. 'You have the keen
eyes of your fair kindred, Legolas,' he said, 'and they can tell a sparrow from a finch
a league off. Tell me, can you see anything away yonder towards Isengard?'
 'Many miles lie between,' said Legolas, gazing thither and shading his eyes with
his long hand. 'I can see a darkness. There are shapes moving in it, great shapes far
away upon the bank of the river; but what they are I cannot tell. It is not mist or cloud
that defeats my eyes: there is a veiling shadow that some power lays upon the land,
and it marches slowly down stream. It is as if the twilight under endless trees were
flowing downwards from the hills.'
 'And behind us comes a very storm of Mordor,' said Gandalf. 'It will be a black
night.'
 As the second day of their riding drew on, the heaviness in the air increased. In the
afternoon the dark clouds began to overtake them: a sombre canopy with great
billowing edges flecked with dazzling light. The sun went down, blood-red in a
smoking haze. The spears of the Riders were tipped with fire as the last shafts of
light kindled the steep faces of the peaks of Thrihyrne: now very near they stood on
the northernmost arm of the White Mountains, three jagged horns staring at the
sunset. In the last red glow men in the vanguard saw a black speck, a horseman
 84
riding back towards them. They halted awaiting him.
 He came, a weary man with dinted helm and cloven shield. Slowly he climbed from
his horse and stood there a while gasping. At length he spoke. 'Is Eomer here?' he
asked. 'You come at last, but too late, and with too little strength. Things have gone
evilly since Theodred fell. We were driven back yesterday over the Isen with great
loss; many perished at the crossing. Then at night fresh forces came over the river
against our camp. All Isengard must be emptied; and Saruman has armed the wild
hillmen and herd-folk of Dunland beyond the rivers, and these also he loosed upon
us. We were overmastered. The shield-wall was broken. Erkenbrand of Westfold has
drawn off those men he could gather towards his fastness in Helm's Deep. The rest
are scattered.
 'Where is Eomer? Tell him there is no hope ahead. He should return to Edoras
before the wolves of Isengard come there.' Theoden had sat silent, hidden from the
man's sight behind his guards; now he urged his horse forward. 'Come, stand before
me, Ceorl!' he said. 'I am here. The last host of the Eorlingas has ridden forth. It will
not return without battle.'
 The man's face lightened with joy and wonder. He drew himself up. Then he knelt,
offering his notched sword to the king. 'Command me, lord!' he cried. 'And pardon
me! I thought–'
 'You thought I remained in Meduseld bent like an old tree under winter snow. So it
was when you rode to war. But a west wind has shaken the boughs,' said Theoden.
'Give this man a fresh horse! Let us ride to the help of Erkenbrand!'
 While Theoden was speaking, Gandalf rode a short way ahead, and he sat there
alone, gazing north to Isengard and west to the setting sun. Now he came back.
 'Ride, Theoden!' he said. 'Ride to Helm's Deep! Go not to the Fords of Isen, and do
not tarry in the plain! I must leave you for a while. Shadowfax must bear me now on
a swift errand.' Turning to Aragorn and Eomer and the men of the king's household,
he cried: 'Keep well the Lord of the Mark, till I return. Await me at Helm's Gate!
Farewell!'
 He spoke a word to Shadowfax, and like an arrow from the bow the great horse
sprang away. Even as they looked he was gone: a flash of silver in the sunset, a
wind over the grass, a shadow that fled and passed from sight. Snowmane snorted
and reared, eager to follow; but only a swift bird on the wing could have overtaken
him.
 'What does that mean?' said one of the guard to Hama.
 'That Gandalf Greyhame has need of haste,' answered Hama. 'Ever he goes and
comes unlooked-for.'
 'Wormtongue, were he here, would not find it hard to explain,' said the other.
 'True enough,' said Hama, 'but for myself, I will wait until I see Gandalf again.'
 'Maybe you will wait long,' said the other.
 The host turned away now from the road to the Fords of Isen and bent their course
southward. Night fell, and still they rode on. The hills drew near, but the tall peaks of
Thrihyrne were already dim against the darkening sky. Still some miles away, on the
far side of the Westfold Vale, lay a green coomb, a great bay in the mountains, out of
which a gorge opened in the hills. Men of that land called it Helm's Deep, after a hero
of old wars who had made his refuge there. Ever steeper and narrower it wound
inward from the north under the shadow of the Thrihyrne, till the crow-haunted cliffs
rose like mighty towers on either side, shutting out the light.
 At Helm's Gate, before the mouth of the Deep, there was a heel of rock thrust
outward by the northern cliff. There upon its spur stood high walls of ancient stone,
 85
and within them was a lofty tower. Men said that in the far-off days of the glory of
Gondor the sea-kings had built here this fastness with the hands of giants. The
Hornburg it was called, for a trumpet sounded upon the tower echoed in the Deep
behind, as if armies long-forgotten were issuing to war from caves beneath the hills.
A wall, too, the men of old had made from the Hornburg to the southern cliff, barring
the entrance to the gorge. Beneath it by a wide culvert the Deeping-stream passed
out. About the feet of the Hornrock it wound, and flowed then in a gully through the
midst of a wide green gore, sloping gently down from Helm's Gate to Helm's Dike.
Thence it fell into the Deeping-coomb and out into the Westfold Vale. There in the
Hornburg at Helm's Gate Erkenbrand, master of Westfold on the borders of the
Mark, now dwelt. As the days darkened with threat of war, being wise, he had
repaired the wall and made the fastness strong.
 The Riders were still in the low valley before the mouth of the Coomb, when cries
and hornblasts were heard from their scouts that went in front. Out of the darkness
arrows whistled. Swiftly a scout rode back and reported that wolf-riders were abroad
in the valley, and that a host of Orcs and wild men were hurrying southward from the
Fords of Isen and seemed to be making for Helm's Deep.
 'We have found many of our folk lying slain as they fled thither,' said the scout.
'And we have met scattered companies, going this way and that, leaderless. What
has become of Erkenbrand none seem to know. It is likely that he will be overtaken
ere he can reach Helm's Gate, if he has not already perished.'
 'Has aught been seen of Gandalf?' asked Theoden.
 'Yes, lord. Many have seen an old man in white upon a horse, passing hither and
thither over the plains like wind in the grass. Some thought he was Saruman. It is
said that he went away ere nightfall towards Isengard. Some say also that
Wormtongue was seen earlier, going northward with a company of Orcs.'
 'It will go ill with Wormtongue, if Gandalf comes upon him said Theoden.
'Nonetheless I miss now both my counsellors, the old and the new. But in this need
we have no better choice than to go on, as Gandalf said, to Helm's Gate, whether
Erkenbrand be there or no. Is it known how great is the host that comes from the
North?'
 'It is very great,' said the scout. 'He that flies counts every foeman twice, yet I have
spoken to stouthearted men, and I do not doubt that the main strength of the enemy
is many times as great as all that we have here.'
 'Then let us be swift,' said Eomer. 'Let us drive through such foes as are already
between us and the fastness. There are caves in Helm's Deep where hundreds may
lie hid; and secret ways lead thence up on to the hills.
 'Trust not to secret ways,' said the king. 'Saruman has long spied out this land. Still
in that place our defence may last long. Let us go!'
 Aragorn and Legolas went now with Eomer in the van. On through the dark night
they rode, ever slower as the darkness deepened and their way climbed southward,
higher and higher into the dim folds about the mountains' feet. They found few of the
enemy before them. Here and there they came upon roving bands of Orcs; but they
fled ere the Riders could take or slay them.
 'It will not be long I fear,' said Eomer, 'ere the coming of the king's host will be
known to the leader of our enemies, Saruman or whatever captain he has sent forth.'
 The rumour of war grew behind them. Now they could hear, borne over the dark,
the sound of harsh singing. They had climbed far up into the Deeping-coomb when
they looked back. Then they saw torches: countless points of fiery light upon the
black fields behind, scattered like red flowers, or winding up from the lowlands in
 86
long flickering lines. Here and there a larger blaze leapt up.
 'It is a great host and follows us hard,' said Aragorn.
 'They bring fire,' said Theoden, 'and they are burning as they come, rick, cot, and
tree. This was a rich vale and had many homesteads. Alas for my folk!'
 'Would that day was here and we might ride down upon them like a storm out of
the mountains!' said Aragorn. 'It grieves me to fly before them.'
 'We need not fly much further,' said Eomer. 'Not far ahead now lies Helm's Dike, an
ancient trench and rampart scored across the coomb, two furlongs below Helm's
Gate. There we can turn and give battle.'
 'Nay, we are too few to defend the Dike,' said Theoden. 'It is a mile long or more,
and the breach in it is wide.'
 'At the breach our rearguard must stand, if we are pressed,' said Eomer.
 There was neither star nor moon when the Riders came to the breach in the Dike,
where the stream from above passed out, and the road beside it ran down from the
Hornburg. The rampart loomed suddenly before them, a high shadow beyond a dark
pit. As they rode up a sentinel challenged them.
 'The Lord of the Mark rides to Helm's Gate,' Eomer answered. 'I, Eomer son of
Eomund, speak.'
 'This is good tidings beyond hope,' said the sentinel. 'Hasten! The enemy is on
your heels.'
 The host passed through the breach and halted on the sloping sward above. They
now learned to their joy that Erkenbrand had left many men to hold Helm's Gate, and
more had since escaped thither.
 'Maybe, we have a thousand fit to fight on foot,' said Gamling, an old man, the
leader of those that watched the Dike. 'But most of them have seen too many
winters, as I have, or too few, as my son's son here. What news of Erkenbrand?
Word came yesterday that he was retreating hither with all that is left of the best
Riders of Westfold. But he has not come.'
 'I fear that he will not come now,' said Eomer. 'Our scouts have gained no news of
him, and the enemy fills all the valley behind us.'
 'I would that he had escaped,' said Theoden. 'He was a mighty man. In him lived
again the valour of Helm the Hammerhand. But we cannot await him here. We must
draw all our forces now behind the walls. Are you well stored? We bring little
provision, for we rode forth to open battle, not to a siege.'
 'Behind us in the caves of the Deep are three parts of the folk of Westfold, old and
young, children and women,' said Gamling. 'But great store of food, and many
beasts and their fodder, have also been gathered there.'
 'That is well,' said Eomer. 'They are burning or despoiling all that is left in the vale.'
 'If they come to bargain for our goods at Helm's Gate, they will pay a high price,'
said Gamling.
 The king and his Riders passed on. Before the causeway that crossed the stream
they dismounted. In a long file they led their horses up the ramp and passed within
the gates of the Hornburg. There they were welcomed again with joy and renewed
hope; for now there were men enough to man both the burg and the barrier wall.
 Quickly Eomer set his men in readiness. The king and the men of his household
were in the Hornburg, and there also were many of the Westfold-men. But on the
Deeping Wall and its tower, and behind it, Eomer arrayed most of the strength that
he had, for here the defence seemed more doubtful, if the assault were determined
and in great force. The horses were led far up the Deep under such guard as could
be spared.
 87
 The Deeping Wall was twenty feet high, and so thick that four men could walk
abreast along the top, sheltered by a parapet over which only a tall man could look.
Here and there were clefts in the stone through which men could shoot. This
battlement could be reached by a stair running down from a door in the outer court of
the Hornburg; three flights of steps led also up on to the wall from the Deep behind;
but in front it was smooth, and the great stones of it were set with such skill that no
foothold could be found at their joints, and at the top they hung over like a seadelved cliff.
 Gimli stood leaning against the breastwork upon the wall. Legolas sat above on the
parapet, fingering his bow, and peering out into the gloom.
 'This is more to my liking,' said the dwarf, stamping on the stones. 'Ever my heart
rises as we draw near the mountains. There is good rock here. This country has
tough bones. I felt them in my feet as we came up from the dike. Give me a year and
a hundred of my kin and I would make this a place that armies would break upon like
water.'
 'I do not doubt it,' said Legolas. 'But you are a dwarf, and dwarves are strange folk.
I do not like this place, and I shall like it no more by the light of day. But you comfort
me, Gimli, and I am glad to have you standing nigh with your stout legs and your
hard axe. I wish there were more of your kin among us. But even more would I give
for a hundred good archers of Mirkwood. We shall need them. The Rohirrim have
good bowmen after their fashion, but there are too few here, too few.'
 'It is dark for archery,' said Gimli. 'Indeed it is time for sleep. Sleep! I feel the need
of it, as never I thought any dwarf could. Riding is tiring work. Yet my axe is restless
in my hand. Give me a row of orc-necks and room to swing and all weariness will fall
from me!'
 A slow time passed. Far down in the valley scattered fires still burned. The hosts of
Isengard were advancing in silence now. Their torches could be seen winding up the
coomb in many lines.
 Suddenly from the Dike yells and screams, and the fierce battle-cries of men broke
out. Flaming brands appeared over the brink and clustered thickly at the breach.
Then they scattered and vanished. Men came galloping back over the field and up
the ramp to the gate of the Hornburg. The rearguard of the Westfolders had been
driven in.
 'The enemy is at hand!' they said. 'We loosed every arrow that we had, and filled
the Dike with Orcs. But it will not halt them long. Already they are scaling the bank at
many points, thick as marching ants. But we have taught them not to carry torches.'
 It was now past midnight. The sky was utterly dark, and the stillness of the heavy
air foreboded storm. Suddenly the clouds were seared by a blinding flash. Branched
lightning smote down upon the eastward hills. For a staring moment the watchers on
the walls saw all the space between them and the Dike lit with white light: it was
boiling and crawling with black shapes, some squat and broad, some tall and grim,
with high helms and sable shields. Hundreds and hundreds more were pouring over
the Dike and through the breach. The dark tide flowed up to the walls from cliff to
cliff. Thunder rolled in the valley. Rain came lashing down.
 Arrows thick as the rain came whistling over the battlements, and fell clinking and
glancing on the stones. Some found a mark. The assault on Helm's Deep had
begun, but no sound or challenge was heard within; no answering arrows came.
 The assailing hosts halted, foiled by the silent menace of rock and wall. Ever and
again the lightning tore aside the darkness. Then the Orcs screamed, waving spear
and sword, and shooting a cloud of arrows at any that stood revealed upon the
 88
battlements; and the men of the Mark amazed looked out, as it seemed to them,
upon a great field of dark corn, tossed by a tempest of war, and every ear glinted
with barbed light.
 Brazen trumpets sounded. The enemy surged forward, some against the Deeping
Wall, other towards the causeway and the ramp that led up to the Hornburg-gates.
There the hugest Orcs were mustered, and the wild men of the Dunland fells. A
moment they hesitated and then on they came. The lightning flashed, and blazoned
upon every helm and shield the ghastly hand of Isengard was seen. They reached
the summit of the rock; they drove towards the gates.
 Then at last an answer came: a storm of arrows met them, and a hail of stones.
They wavered, broke, and fled back; and then charged again, broke and charged
again; and each time, like the incoming sea, they halted at a higher point. Again
trumpets rang, and a press of roaring men leaped forth. They held their great shields
above them like a roof, while in their midst they bore two trunks of mighty trees.
Behind them orc-archers crowded, sending a hail of darts against the bowmen on
the walls. They gained the gates. The trees, swung by strong arms, smote the
timbers with a rending boom. If any man fell, crushed by a stone hurtling from above,
two others sprang to take his place. Again and again the great rams swung and
crashed.
 Eomer and Aragorn stood together on the Deeping Wall. They heard the roar of
voices and the thudding of the rams; and then in a sudden flash of light they beheld
the peril of the gates.
 'Come!' said Aragorn. 'This is the hour when we draw swords together!'
 Running like fire, they sped along the wall, and up the steps, and passed into the
outer court upon the Rock. As they ran they gathered a handful of stout swordsmen.
There was a small postern-door that opened in an angle of the burg-wall on the west,
where the cliff stretched out to meet it. On that side a narrow path ran round towards
the great gate, between the wall and the sheer brink of the Rock. Together Eomer
and Aragorn sprang through the door, their men close behind. The swords flashed
from the sheath as one.
 'Guthwine!' cried Eomer. 'Guthwine for the Mark!'
 'Anduril!' cried Aragorn. 'Anduril for the Dunedain!'
 Charging from the side, they hurled themselves upon the wild men. Anduril rose
and fell, gleaming with white fire. A shout went up from wall and tower: 'Anduril!
Anduril goes to war. The Blade that was Broken shines again!'
 Dismayed the rammers let fall the trees and turned to fight; but the wall of their
shields was broken as by a lightning-stroke, and they were swept away, hewn down,
or cast over the Rock into the stony stream below. The orc-archers shot wildly and
then fled.
 For a moment Eomer and Aragorn halted before the gates. The thunder was
rumbling in the distance now. The lightning flickered still, far off among the
mountains in the South. A keen wind was blowing from the North again. The clouds
were torn and drifting, and stars peeped out; and above the hills of the Coomb-side
the westering moon rode, glimmering yellow in the storm-wrack.
 'We did not come too soon,' said Aragorn, looking at the gates. Their great hinges
and iron bars were wrenched and bent; many of their timbers were cracked.
 'Yet we cannot stay here beyond the walls to defend them,' said Eomer. 'Look!' He
pointed to the causeway. Already a great press of Orcs and Men were gathering
again beyond the stream. Arrows whined, and skipped on the stones about them.
'Come! We must get back and see what we can do to pile stone and beam across
 89
the gates within. Come now!'
 They turned and ran. At that moment some dozen Orcs that had lain motionless
among the slain leaped to their feet, and came silently and swiftly behind. Two flung
themselves to the ground at Eomer's heels, tripped him, and in a moment they were
on top of him. But a small dark figure that none had observed sprang out of the
shadows and gave a hoarse shout: Baruk Khazad! Khazad ai-menu! An axe swung
and swept back. Two Orcs fell headless. The rest fled.
 Eomer struggled to his feet, even as Aragorn ran back to his aid.
 The postern was closed again, the iron door was barred and piled inside with
stones. When all were safe within, Eomer turned: 'I thank you, Gimli son of Gloin!' he
said. 'I did not know that you were with us in the sortie. But oft the unbidden guest
proves the best company. How came you there?'
 'I followed you to shake off sleep,' said Gimli, 'but I looked on the hillmen and they
seemed over large for me, so I sat beside a stone to see your sword-play.'
 'I shall not find it easy to repay you,' said Eomer.
 'There may be many a chance ere the night is over,' laughed the Dwarf. 'But I am
content. Till now I have hewn naught but wood since I left Moria.'
 'Two!' said Gimli, patting his axe. He had returned to his place on the wall.
 'Two?' said Legolas. 'I have done better, though now I must grope for spent
arrows; all mine are gone. Yet I make my tale twenty at the least. But that is only a
few leaves in a forest.'
 The sky now was quickly clearing and the sinking moon was shining brightly. But
the light brought little hope to the Riders of the Mark. The enemy before them
seemed to have grown rather than diminished, still more were pressing up from the
valley through the breach. The sortie upon the Rock gained only a brief respite. The
assault on the gates was redoubled. Against the Deeping Wall the hosts of Isengard
roared like a sea. Orcs and hillmen swarmed about its feet from end to end. Ropes
with grappling hooks were hurled over the parapet faster than men could cut them or
fling them back. Hundreds of long ladders were lifted up. Many were cast down in
ruin, but many more replaced them, and Orcs sprang up them like apes in the dark
forests of the South. Before the wall's foot the dead and broken were piled like
shingle in a storm; ever higher rose the hideous mounds, and still the enemy came
on.
 The men of Rohan grew weary. All their arrows were spent, and every shaft was
shot; their swords were notched, and their shields were riven. Three times Aragorn
and Eomer rallied them, and three times Anduril flamed in a desperate charge that
drove the enemy from the wall.
 Then a clamour arose in the Deep behind. Orcs had crept like rats through the
culvert through which the stream flowed out. There they had gathered in the shadow
of the cliffs, until the assault above was hottest and nearly all the men of the defence
had rushed to the wall's top. Then they sprang out. Already some had passed into
the jaws of the Deep and were among the horses, fighting with the guards.
 Down from the wall leapt Gimli with a fierce cry that echoed in the cliffs. 'Khazad!
Khazad!' He soon had work enough.
'Ai-oi!' he shouted. 'The Orcs are behind the wall. Ai-oi! Come, Legolas! There are
enough for us both. Khazad ai-menu!'
 Gamling the Old looked down from the Hornburg, hearing the great voice of the
dwarf above all the tumult. 'The Orcs are in the Deep!' he cried. 'Helm! Helm! Forth
Helmingas!' he shouted as he leaped down the stair from the Rock with many men of
Westfold at his back.
 90
 Their onset was fierce and sudden, and the Orcs gave way before them. Ere long
they were hemmed in in the narrows of the gorge, and all were slain or driven
shrieking into the chasm of the Deep to fall before the guardians of the hidden caves.
 'Twenty-one!' cried Gimli. He hewed a two-handed stroke and laid the last Orc
before his feet. 'Now my count passes Master Legolas again.'
 'We must stop this rat-hole,' said Gamling. 'Dwarves are said to be cunning folk
with stone. Lend us your aid, master!'
 'We do not shape stone with battle-axes, nor with our finger-nails,' said Gimli. 'But I
will help as I may.'
 They gathered such small boulders and broken stones as they could find to hand,
and under Gimli's direction the Westfold-men blocked up the inner end of the culvert,
until only a narrow outlet remained. Then the Deeping-stream, swollen by the rain,
churned and fretted in its choked path, and spread slowly in cold pools from cliff to
cliff.
 'It will be drier above,' said Gimli. 'Come, Gamling, let us see how things go on the
wall!'
 He climbed up and found Legolas beside Aragorn and Eomer. The elf was
whetting his long knife. There was for a while a lull in the assault, since the attempt
to break in through the culvert had been foiled.
 'Twenty-one!' said Gimli.
 'Good!' said Legolas. 'But my count is now two dozen. It has been knife-work up
here.'
 Eomer and Aragorn leant wearily on their swords. Away on the left the crash and
clamour of the battle on the Rock rose loud again. But the Hornburg still held fast,
like an island in the sea. Its gates lay in ruin; but over the barricade of beams and
stones within no enemy as yet had passed.
 Aragorn looked at the pale stars, and at the moon, now sloping behind the western
hills that enclosed the valley. 'This is a night as long as years,' he said. 'How long will
the day tarry?'
 'Dawn is not far off,' said Gamling, who had now climbed up beside him. 'But dawn
will not help us, I fear.'
 'Yet dawn is ever the hope of men,' said Aragorn.
 'But these creatures of Isengard, these half-orcs and goblin-men that the foul craft
of Saruman has bred, they will not quail at the sun,' said Gamling. 'And neither will
the wild men of the hills. Do you not hear their voices?'
 'I hear them,' said Eomer; 'but they are only the scream of birds and the bellowing
of beasts to my ears.'
 'Yet there are many that cry in the Dunland tongue,' said Gamling. 'I know that
tongue. It is an ancient speech of men, and once was spoken in many western
valleys of the Mark. Hark! They hate us, and they are glad; for our doom seems
certain to them. 'The king, the king!' they cry. 'We will take their king. Death to the
Forgoil! Death to the Strawheads! Death to the robbers of the North!' Such names
they have for us. Not in half a thousand years have they forgotten their grievance
that the lords of Gondor gave the Mark to Eorl the Young and made alliance with
him. That old hatred Saruman has inflamed. They are fierce folk when roused. They
will not give way now for dusk or dawn, until Theoden is taken, or they themselves
are slain.'
 'Nonetheless day will bring hope to me,' said Aragorn. 'Is it not said that no foe has
ever taken the Hornburg, if men defended it?'
 'So the minstrels say,' said Eomer.
 91
 'Then let us defend it, and hope!' said Aragorn.
 Even as they spoke there came a blare of trumpets. Then there was a crash and a
flash of flame and smoke. The waters of the Deeping-stream poured out hissing and
foaming: they were choked no longer, a gaping hole was blasted in the wall. A host
of dark shapes poured in.
 'Devilry of Saruman!' cried Aragorn. 'They have crept in the culvert again, while we
talked, and they have lit the fire of Orthanc beneath our feet. 'Elendil, Elendil!' he
shouted, as he leaped down into the breach; but even as he did so a hundred
ladders were raised against the battlements. Over the wall and under the wall the
last assault came sweeping like a dark wave upon a hill of sand. The defence was
swept away. Some of the Riders were driven back, further and further into the Deep,
falling and fighting as they gave way, step by step, towards the caves. Others cut
their way back towards the citadel.
 A broad stairway, climbed from the Deep up to the Rock and the rear-gate of the
Hornburg. Near the bottom stood Aragorn. In his hand still Anduril gleamed, and the
terror of the sword for a while held back the enemy, as one by one all who could gain
the stair passed up towards the gate. Behind on the upper steps knelt Legolas. His
bow was bent, but one gleaned arrow was all that he had left, and he peered out
now, ready to shoot the first Orc that should dare to approach the stair.
 'All who can have now got safe within, Aragorn,' he called. 'Come back!'
 Aragorn turned and sped up the stair; but as he ran he stumbled in his weariness.
At once his enemies leapt forward. Up came the Orcs, yelling, with their long arms
stretched out to seize him. The foremost fell with Legolas' last arrow in his throat. but
the rest sprang over him. Then a great boulder, cast from the outer wall above,
crashed down upon the stair, and hurled them back into the Deep. Aragorn gained
the door, and swiftly it clanged to behind him.
 'Things go ill, my friends,' he said, wiping the sweat from his brow with his arm.
 'Ill enough,' said Legolas, 'but not yet hopeless, while we have you with us. Where
is Gimli?'
 'I do not know.' said Aragorn. 'I last saw him fighting on the ground behind the wall,
but the enemy swept us apart.'
 'Alas! That is evil news,' said Legolas.
 'He is stout and strong,' said Aragorn. 'Let us hope that he will escape back to the
 92
caves. There he would be safe for a while. Safer than we. Such a refuge would be to
the liking of a dwarf.'
 'That must be my hope,' said Legolas. 'But I wish that he had come this way. I
desired to tell Master Gimli that my tale is now thirty-nine.'
 'If he wins back to the caves, he will pass your count again,' laughed Aragorn.
'Never did I see an axe so wielded.'
 'I must go and seek some arrows,' said Legolas. 'Would that this night would end,
and I could have better light for shooting.'
 Aragorn now passed into the citadel. There to his dismay he learned that Eomer
had not reached the Hornburg.
 'Nay, he did not come to the Rock,' said one of the Westfold-men, 'I last saw him
gathering men about him and fighting in the mouth of the Deep. Gamling was with
him, and the dwarf; but I could not come to them.'
 Aragorn strode on through the inner court, and mounted to a high chamber in the
tower. There stood the king, dark against a narrow window, looking out upon the
vale.
 'What is the news, Aragorn?' he said.
 'The Deeping Wall is taken, lord, and all the defence swept away; but many have
escaped hither to the Rock.'
 'Is Eomer here?'
 'No, lord. But many of your men retreated into the Deep; and some say that Eomer
was amongst them. In the narrows they may hold back the enemy and come within
the caves. What hope they may have then I do not know.'
 'More than we. Good provision, it is said. And the air is wholesome there because
of the outlets through fissures in the rock far above. None can force an entrance
against determined men. They may hold out long.'
 'But the Orcs have brought a devilry from Orthanc,' said Aragorn. 'They have a
blasting fire, and with it they took the Wall. If they cannot come in the caves, they
may seal up those that are inside. But now we must turn all our thoughts to our own
defence.'
 'I fret in this prison,' said Theoden. 'If I could have set a spear in rest, riding before
my men upon the field, maybe I could have felt again the joy of battle, and so ended.
But I serve little purpose here.'
 'Here at least you are guarded in the strongest fastness of the Mark,' said Aragorn.
'More hope we have to defend you in the Hornburg than in Edoras, or even at
Dunharrow in the mountains.'
 'It is said that the Hornburg has never fallen to assault,' said Theoden; 'but now my
heart is doubtful. The world changes, and all that once was strong now proves
unsure. How shall any tower withstand such numbers and such reckless hate? Had I
known that the strength of Isengard was grown so great, maybe l should not so
rashly have ridden forth to meet it, for all the arts of Gandalf. His counsel seems not
now so good as it did under the morning sun.'
 'Do not judge the counsel of Gandalf, until all is over, lord,' said Aragorn.
 'The end will not be long,' said the king. 'But I will not end here, taken like an old
badger in a trap. Snowmane and Hasufel and the horses of my guard are in the inner
court. When dawn comes, I will bid men sound Helm's horn, and I will ride forth. Will
you ride with me then, son of Arathorn? Maybe we shall cleave a road, or make such
an end as will be worth a song – if any be left to sing of us hereafter.'
 'I will ride with you,' said Aragorn.
 Taking his leave, he returned to the walls, and passed round all their circuit,
 93
enheartening the men, and lending aid wherever the assault was hot. Legolas went
with him. Blasts of fire leaped up from below shaking the stones. Grappling-hooks
were hurled, and ladders raised. Again and again the Orcs gained the summit of the
outer wall, and again the defenders cast them down.
 At last Aragorn stood above the great gates, heedless of the darts of the enemy.
As he looked forth he saw the eastern sky grow pale. Then he raised his empty
hand, palm outward in token of parley.
 The Orcs yelled and jeered. 'Come down! Come down!' they cried. 'If you wish to
speak to us, come down! Bring out your king! We are the fighting Uruk-hai. We will
fetch him from his hole, if he does not come. Bring out your skulking king!'
 'The king stays or comes at his own will,' said Aragorn.
 'Then what are you doing here?' they answered. 'Why do you look out? Do you
wish to see the greatness of our army? We are the fighting Uruk-hai.'
 'I looked out to see the dawn,' said Aragorn.
 'What of the dawn?' they jeered. 'We are the Uruk-hai: we do not stop the fight for
night or day, for fair weather or for storm. We come to kill, by sun or moon. What of
the dawn?'
 'None knows what the new day shall bring him,' said Aragorn. 'Get you gone, ere it
turn to your evil.'
 'Get down or we will shoot you from the wall,' they cried. 'This is no parley. You
have nothing to say.'
 'I have still this to say,' answered Aragorn. 'No enemy has yet taken the Hornburg.
Depart, or not one of you will be spared. Not one will be left alive to take back tidings
to the North. You do not know your peril.'
 So great a power and royalty was revealed in Aragorn, as he stood there alone
above the ruined gates before the host of his enemies, that many of the wild men
paused, and looked back over their shoulders to the valley, and some looked up
doubtfully at the sky. But the Orcs laughed with loud voices; and a hail of darts and
arrows whistled over the wall, as Aragorn leaped down.
 There was a roar and a blast of fire. The archway of the gate above which he had
stood a moment before crumbled and crashed in smoke and dust. The barricade
was scattered as if by a thunderbolt. Aragorn ran to the king's tower.
 But even as the gate fell, and the Orcs about it yelled, preparing to charge, a
murmur arose behind them, like a wind in the distance, and it grew to a clamour of
many voices crying strange news in the dawn. The Orcs upon the Rock, hearing the
rumour of dismay, wavered and looked back. And then, sudden and terrible, from the
tower above, the sound of the great horn of Helm rang out.
 All that heard that sound trembled. Many of the Orcs cast themselves on their
faces and covered their ears with their claws. Back from the Deep the echoes came,
blast upon blast, as if on every cliff and hill a mighty herald stood. But on the walls
men looked up, listening with wonder; for the echoes did not die. Ever the hornblasts wound on among
the hills; nearer now and louder they answered one to
another, blowing fierce and free.
 'Helm! Helm!' the Riders shouted. 'Helm is arisen and comes back to war. Helm for
Theoden King!'
 And with that shout the king came. His horse was white as snow, golden was his
shield, and his spear was long. At his right hand was Aragorn, Elendil's heir, behind
him rode the lords of the House of Eorl the Young. Light sprang in the sky. Night
departed.
 'Forth Eorlingas!' With a cry and a great noise they charged. Down from the gates
 94
they roared, over the causeway they swept, and they drove through the hosts of
Isengard as a wind among grass. Behind them from the Deep came the stern cries
of men issuing from the caves, driving forth the enemy. Out poured all the men that
were left upon the Rock. And ever the sound of blowing horns echoed in the hills.
 On they rode, the king and his companions. Captains and champions fell or fled
before them. Neither orc nor man withstood them. Their backs were to the swords
and spears of the Riders and their faces to the valley. They cried and wailed, for fear
and great wonder had come upon them with the rising of the day.
 So King Theoden rode from Helm's Gate and clove his path to the great Dike.
There the company halted. Light grew bright about them. Shafts of the sun flared
above the eastern hills and glimmered on their spears. But they sat silent on their
horses, and they gazed down upon the Deeping-coomb.
 The land had changed. Where before the green dale had lain, its grassy slopes
lapping the ever-mounting hills, there now a forest loomed. Great trees, bare and
silent, stood, rank on rank, with tangled bough and hoary head; their twisted roots
were buried in the long green grass. Darkness was under them. Between the Dike
and the eaves of that nameless wood only two open furlongs lay. There now
cowered the proud hosts of Saruman, in terror of the king and in terror of the trees.
They streamed down from Helm's Gate until all above the Dike was empty of them,
but below it they were packed like swarming flies. Vainly they crawled and
clambered about the walls of the coomb, seeking to escape. Upon the east too sheer
and stony was the valley's side; upon the left, from the west, their final doom
approached.
 There suddenly upon a ridge appeared a rider, clad in white, shining in the rising
sun. Over the low hills the horns were sounding. Behind him, hastening down the
long slopes, were a thousand men on foot; their swords were in their hands. Amid
them strode a man tall and strong. His shield was red. As he came to the valley's
brink, he set to his lips a great black horn and blew a ringing blast.
 'Erkenbrand!' the Riders shouted. 'Erkenbrand!'
 'Behold the White Rider!' cried Aragorn. 'Gandalf is come again!'
 'Mithrandir, Mithrandir!' said Legolas. 'This is wizardry indeed! Come! I would look
on this forest, ere the spell changes.'
 The hosts of Isengard roared, swaying this way and that, turning from fear to fear.
Again the horn sounded from the tower. Down through the breach of the Dike
charged the king's company. Down from the hills leaped Erkenbrand, lord of
Westfold. Down leaped Shadowfax, like a deer that runs surefooted in the
mountains. The White Rider was upon them, and the terror of his coming filled the
enemy with madness. The wild men fell on their faces before him. The Orcs reeled
and screamed and cast aside both sword and spear. Like a black smoke driven by a
mounting wind they fled. Wailing they passed under the waiting shadow of the trees;
and from that shadow none ever came again.
Chapter 8
The Road to Isengard
 So it was that in the light of a fair morning King Theoden and Gandalf the White
Rider met again upon the green grass beside the Deeping-stream. There was also
Aragorn son of Arathorn, and Legolas the Elf, and Erkenbrand of Westfold, and the
lords of the Golden House. About them were gathered the Rohirrim, the Riders of the
Mark: wonder overcame their joy in victory, and their eyes were turned towards the
 95
wood.
 Suddenly there was a great shout, and down from the Dike came those who had
been driven back into the Deep. There came Gamling the Old, and Eomer son of
Eomund, and beside them walked Gimli the dwarf. He had no helm, and about his
head was a linen band stained with blood; but his voice was loud and strong.
 'Forty-two, Master Legolas!' he cried. 'Alas! My axe is notched: the forty-second
had an iron collar on his neck. How is it with you?'
 'You have passed my score by one,' answered Legolas. 'But I do not grudge you
the game, so glad am I to see you on your legs!'
 'Welcome, Eomer, sister-son!' said Theoden. 'Now that I see you safe, I am glad
indeed.'
 'Hail, Lord of the Mark!' said Eomer. 'The dark night has passed and day has come
again. But the day has brought strange tidings.' He turned and gazed in wonder, first
at the wood and then at Gandalf. 'Once more you come in the hour of need,
unlooked-for,' he said.
 'Unlooked-for?' said Gandalf. 'I said that I would return and meet you here.'
 'But you did not name the hour, nor foretell the manner of your coming. Strange
help you bring. You are mighty in wizardry, Gandalf the White!'
 'That may be. But if so, I have not shown it yet. I have but given good counsel in
peril, and made use of the speed of Shadowfax. Your own valour has done more,
and the stout legs of the Westfold-men marching through the night.'
 Then they all gazed at Gandalf with still greater wonder. Some glanced darkly at
the wood, and passed their hands over their brows, as if they thought their eyes saw
otherwise than his.
 Gandalf laughed long and merrily. 'The trees?' he said. 'Nay, I see the wood as
plainly as do you. But that is no deed of mine. It is a thing beyond the counsel of the
wise. Better than my design, and better even than my hope the event has proved.'
 'Then if not yours, whose is the wizardry?' said Theoden. 'Not Saruman's, that is
plain. Is there some mightier sage, of whom we have yet to learn?'
 'It is not wizardry, but a power far older,' said Gandalf: 'a power that walked the
earth, ere elf sang or hammer rang.
Ere iron was found or tree was hewn,
When young was mountain under moon;
Ere ring was made, or wrought was woe,
It walked the forests long ago.'
 'And what may be the answer to your riddle?' said Theoden.
 'If you would learn that, you should come with me to Isengard,' answered Gandalf.
 'To Isengard?' they cried.
 'Yes,' said Gandalf. 'I shall return to Isengard, and those who will may come with
me. There we may see strange things.'
 'But there are not men enough in the Mark, not if they were all gathered together
and healed of wounds and weariness, to assault the stronghold of Saruman,' said
Theoden.
 'Nevertheless to Isengard I go,' said Gandalf. 'I shall not stay there long. My way
lies now eastward. Look for me in Edoras, ere the waning of the moon!'
 'Nay!' said Theoden. 'In the dark hour before dawn I doubted, but we will not part
now. I will come with you, if that is your counsel.'
 'I wish to speak with Saruman, as soon as may be now,' said Gandalf, 'and since
 96
he has done you great injury, it would be fitting if you were there. But how soon and
how swiftly will you ride?'
 'My men are weary with battle,' said the King, 'and I am weary also. For I have
ridden far and slept little. Alas! My old age is not feigned nor due only to the
whisperings of Wormtongue. It is an ill that no leech can wholly cure, not even
Gandalf.'
 'Then let all who are to ride with me rest now,' said Gandalf. 'We will journey under
the shadow of evening. It is as well; for it is my counsel that all our comings and
goings should be as secret as may be, henceforth. But do not command many men
to go with you, Theoden. We go to a parley not to a fight.'
 The King then chose men that were unhurt and had swift horses, and he sent them
forth with tidings of the victory into every vale of the Mark; and they bore his
summons also, bidding all men, young and old, to come in haste to Edoras. There
the Lord of the Mark would hold an assembly of all that could bear arms, on the
second day after the full moon. To ride with him to Isengard the King chose Eomer
and twenty men of his household. With Gandalf would go Aragorn, and Legolas, and
Gimli. In spite of his hurt the dwarf would not stay behind.
 'It was only a feeble blow and the cap turned it,' he said. 'It would take more than
such an orc-scratch to keep me back.'
 'I will tend it, while you rest,' said Aragorn.
 The king now returned to the Hornburg, and slept, such a sleep of quiet as he had
not known for many years, and the remainder of his chosen company rested also.
But the others, all that were not hurt or wounded, began a great labour; for many had
fallen in the battle and lay dead upon the field or in the Deep.
 No Orcs remained alive; their bodies were uncounted. But a great many of the
hillmen had given themselves up; and they were afraid, and cried for mercy.
 The Men of the Mark took their weapons from them, and set them to work.
 'Help now to repair the evil in which you have joined,' said Erkenbrand, 'and
afterwards you shall take an oath never again to pass the Fords of Isen in arms, nor
to march with the enemies of Men; and then you shall go free back to your land. For
you have been deluded by Saruman. Many of you have got death as the reward of
your trust in him; but had you conquered, little better would your wages have been.'
 The men of Dunland were amazed, for Saruman had told them that the men of
Rohan were cruel and burned their captives alive.
 In the midst of the field before the Hornburg two mounds were raised, and beneath
them were laid all the Riders of the Mark who fell in the defence, those of the East
Dales upon one side, and those of Westfold upon the other. In a grave alone under
the shadow of the Hornburg lay Hama, captain of the King's guard. He fell before the
Gate.
 The Orcs were piled in great heaps, away from the mounds of Men, not far from
the eaves of the forest. And the people were troubled in their minds; for the heaps of
carrion were too great for burial or for burning. They had little wood for firing, and
none would have dared to take an axe to the strange trees, even if Gandalf had not
warned them to hurt neither bark nor bough at their great peril.
 'Let the Orcs lie,' said Gandalf. 'The morning may bring new counsel.'
 In the afternoon the King's company prepared to depart. The work of burial was
then but beginning; and Theoden mourned for the loss of Hama, his captain, and
cast the first earth upon his grave. 'Great injury indeed has Saruman done to me and
all this land,' he said, 'and I will remember it, when we meet.'
 The sun was already drawing near the hills upon the west of the Coomb, when at
 97
last Theoden and Gandalf and their companions rode down from the Dike. Behind
them were gathered a great host, both of the Riders and of the people of Westfold,
old and young, women and children, who had come out from the caves. A song of
victory they sang with clear voices; and then they fell silent, wondering what would
chance, for their eyes were on the trees and they feared them.
 The Riders came to the wood, and they halted; horse and man, they were unwilling
to pass in. The trees were grey and menacing, and a shadow or a mist was about
them. The ends of their long sweeping boughs hung down like searching fingers,
their roots stood up from the ground like the limbs of strange monsters, and dark
caverns opened beneath them. But Gandalf went forward, leading the company, and
where the road from the Hornburg met the trees they saw now an opening like an
arched gate under mighty boughs; and through it Gandalf passed, and they followed
him. Then to their amazement they found that the road ran on, and the Deepingstream beside it; and
the sky was open above and full of golden light. But on either
side the great aisles of the wood were already wrapped in dusk, stretching away into
impenetrable shadows; and there they heard the creaking and groaning of boughs,
and far cries, and a rumour of wordless voices, murmuring angrily. No Orc or other
living creature could be seen.
 Legolas and Gimli were now riding together upon one horse; and they kept close
beside Gandalf, for Gimli was afraid of the wood.
 'It is hot in here,' said Legolas to Gandalf. 'I feel a great wrath about me. Do you
not feel the air throb in your ears?'
 'Yes,' said Gandalf.
 'What has become of the miserable Orcs?' said Legolas.
 'That, I think, no one will ever know,' said Gandalf.
 They rode in silence for a while; but Legolas was ever glancing from side to side,
and would often have halted to listen to the sounds of the wood, if Gimli had allowed
it.
 'These are the strangest trees that ever I saw,' he said, 'and I have seen many an
oak grow from acorn to ruinous age. I wish that there were leisure now to walk
among them: they have voices, and in time I might come to understand their
thought.'
 'No, no!' said Gimli. 'Let us leave them! I guess their thought already: hatred of all
that go on two legs; and their speech is of crushing and strangling.'
 'Not of all that go on two legs,' said Legolas. 'There I think you are wrong. It is Orcs
that they hate. For they do not belong here and know little of Elves and Men. Far
away are the valleys where they sprang. From the deep dales of Fangorn, Gimli, that
is whence they come, I guess.'
 'Then that is the most perilous wood in Middle-earth,' said Gimli. 'I should be
grateful for the part they have played, but I do not love them. You may think them
wonderful, but I have seen a greater wonder in this land, more beautiful than any
grove or glade that ever grew: my heart is still full of it.
 'Strange are the ways of Men, Legolas! Here they have one of the marvels of the
Northern World, and what do they say of it? Caves, they say! Caves! Holes to fly to
in time of war, to store fodder in! My good Legolas, do you know that the caverns of
Helm's Deep are vast and beautiful? There would be an endless pilgrimage of
Dwarves, merely to gaze at them, if such things were known to be. Aye indeed, they
would pay pure gold for a brief glance!'
 'And I would give gold to be excused,' said Legolas, 'and double to be let out, if I
strayed in!'
 98
 'You have not seen, so I forgive your jest,' said Gimli. 'But you speak like a fool. Do
you think those halls are fair, where your King dwells under the hill in Mirkwood, and
Dwarves helped in their making long ago? They are but hovels compared with the
caverns I have seen here: immeasurable halls, filled with an everlasting music of
water that tinkles into pools, as fair as Kheled-zaram in the starlight.
 'And, Legolas, when the torches are kindled and men walk on the sandy floors
under the echoing domes, ah! then, Legolas, gems and crystals and veins of
precious ore glint in the polished walls; and the light glows through folded marbles,
shell-like, translucent as the living hands of Queen Galadriel. There are columns of
white and saffron and dawn-rose, Legolas, fluted and twisted into dreamlike forms;
they spring up from many-coloured floors to meet the glistening pendants of the roof:
wings, ropes, curtains fine as frozen clouds; spears, banners, pinnacles of
suspended palaces! Still lakes mirror them: a glimmering world looks up from dark
pools covered with clear glass; cities, such as the mind of Durin could scarce have
imagined in his sleep, stretch on through avenues and pillared courts, on into the
dark recesses where no light can come. And plink! a silver drop falls, and the round
wrinkles in the glass make all the towers bend and waver like weeds and corals in a
grotto of the sea. Then evening comes: they fade and twinkle out; the torches pass
on into another chamber and another dream. There is chamber after chamber,
Legolas; hall opening out of hall, dome after dome, stair beyond stair; and still the
winding paths lead on into the mountains' heart. Caves! The Caverns of Helm's
Deep! Happy was the chance that drove me there! It makes me weep to leave them.'
 'Then I will wish you this fortune for your comfort, Gimli,' said the Elf, 'that you may
come safe from war and return to see them again. But do not tell all your kindred!
There seems little left for them to do, from your account. Maybe the men of this land
are wise to say little: one family of busy dwarves with hammer and chisel might mar
more than they made.'
 'No, you do not understand,' said Gimli. 'No dwarf could be unmoved by such
loveliness. None of Durin's race would mine those caves for stones or ore, not if
diamonds and gold could be got there. Do you cut down groves of blossoming trees
in the spring-time for firewood? We would tend these glades of flowering stone, not
quarry them. With cautious skill, tap by tap – a small chip of rock and no more,
perhaps, in a whole anxious day – so we could work, and as the years went by, we
should open up new ways, and display far chambers that are still dark, glimpsed only
as a void beyond fissures in the rock. And lights, Legolas! We should make lights,
such lamps as once shone in Khazad-dum; and when we wished we would drive
away the night that has lain there since the hills were made; and when we desired
rest, we would let the night return.'
 'You move me, Gimli,' said Legolas. 'I have never heard you speak like this before.
Almost you make me regret that I have not seen these caves. Come! Let us make
this bargain – if we both return safe out of the perils that await us, we will journey for
a while together. You shall visit Fangorn with me, and then I will come with you to
see Helm's Deep.'
 'That would not be the way of return that I should choose,' said Gimli. 'But I will
endure Fangorn, if I have your promise to come back to the caves and share their
wonder with me.'
 'You have my promise,' said Legolas. 'But alas! Now we must leave behind both
cave and wood for a while: See! We are coming to the end of the trees. How far is it
to Isengard, Gandalf?'
 'About fifteen leagues, as the crows of Saruman make it,' said Gandalf, 'five from
 99
the mouth of Deeping-coomb to the Fords, and ten more from there to the gates of
Isengard. But we shall not ride all the way this night.'
 'And when we come there, what shall we see?' asked Gimli. 'You may know, but I
cannot guess.'
 'I do not know myself for certain,' answered the wizard. 'I was there at nightfall
yesterday, but much may have happened since. Yet I think that you will not say that
the journey was in vain – not though the Glittering Caves of Aglarond be left behind.'
 At last the company passed through the trees, and found that they had come to the
bottom of the Coomb, where the road from Helm's Deep branched, going one way
east to Edoras, and the other north to the Fords of Isen. As they rode from under the
eaves of the wood, Legolas halted and looked back with regret. Then he gave a
sudden cry.
 'There are eyes!' he said. 'Eyes looking out from the shadows of the boughs! I
never saw such eyes before.'
 The others, surprised by his cry, halted and turned; but Legolas started to ride
back.
 'No, no!' cried Gimli. 'Do as you please in your madness, but let me first get down
from this horse! I wish to see no eyes!'
 'Stay, Legolas Greenleaf!' said Gandalf. 'Do not go back into the wood, not yet!
Now is not your time.'
 Even as he spoke, there came forward out of the trees three strange shapes. As
tall as trolls they were, twelve feet or more in height; their strong bodies, stout as
young trees, seemed to be clad with raiment or with hide of close-fitting grey and
brown. Their limbs were long, and their hands had many fingers; their hair was stiff,
and their beards grey-green as moss. They gazed out with solemn eyes, but they
were not looking at the riders: their eyes were bent northwards. Suddenly they lifted
their long hands to their mouths, and sent forth ringing calls, clear as notes of a horn,
but more musical and various. The calls were answered; and turning again, the
riders saw other creatures of the same kind approaching, striding through the grass.
They came swiftly from the North, walking like wading herons in their gait, but not in
their speed; for their legs in their long paces beat quicker than the heron's wings.
The riders cried aloud in wonder, and some set their hands upon their sword-hilts.
 'You need no weapons,' said Gandalf. 'These are but herdsmen. They are not
enemies, indeed they are not concerned with us at all.'
 So it seemed to be; for as he spoke the tall creatures, without a glance at the
riders, strode into the wood and vanished.
 'Herdsmen!' said Theoden. 'Where are their flocks? What are they, Gandalf? For it
is plain that to you, at any rate, they are not strange.'
 'They are the shepherds of the trees,' answered Gandalf. 'Is it so long since you
listened to tales by the fireside? There are children in your land who, out of the
twisted threads of story, could pick the answer to your question. You have seen
Ents, O King, Ents out of Fangorn Forest, which in your tongue you call the Entwood.
Did you think that the name was given only in idle fancy? Nay, Theoden, it is
otherwise: to them you are but the passing tale; all the years from Eorl the Young to
Theoden the Old are of little count to them; and all the deeds of your house but a
small matter.'
 The king was silent. 'Ents!' he said at length. 'Out of the shadows of legend I begin
a little to understand the marvel of the trees, I think. I have lived to see strange days.
Long we have tended our beasts and our fields, built our houses, wrought our tools,
or ridden away to help in the wars of Minas Tirith. And that we called the life of Men,
 100
the way of the world. We cared little for what lay beyond the borders of our land.
Songs we have that tell of these things, but we are forgetting them, teaching them
only to children, as a careless custom. And now the songs have come down among
us out of strange places, and walk visible under the Sun.'
 'You should be glad, Theoden King,' said Gandalf. 'For not only the little life of Men
is now endangered, but the life also of those things which you have deemed the
matter of legend. You are not without allies, even if you know them not.'
 'Yet also I should be sad,' said Theoden. 'For however the fortune of war shall go,
may it not so end that much that was fair and wonderful shall pass for ever out of
Middle-earth?'
 'It may,' said Gandalf. 'The evil of Sauron cannot be wholly cured, nor made as if it
had not been. But to such days we are doomed. Let us now go on with the journey
we have begun!'
 The company turned then away from the Coomb and from the wood and took the
road towards the Fords. Legolas followed reluctantly. The sun had set, already it had
sunk behind the rim of the world; but as they rode out from the shadow of the hills
and looked west to the Gap of Rohan the sky was still red, and a burning light was
under the floating clouds. Dark against it there wheeled and flew many black-winged
birds. Some passed overhead with mournful cries, returning to their homes among
the rocks.
 'The carrion-fowl have been busy about the battle-field,' said Eomer.
 They rode now at an easy pace and dark came down upon the plains about them.
The slow moon mounted, now waxing towards the full, and in its cold silver light the
swelling grass-lands rose and fell like a wide grey sea. They had ridden for some
four hours from the branching of the roads when they drew near to the Fords. Long
slopes ran swiftly down to where the river spread in stony shoals between high
grassy terraces. Borne upon the wind they heard the howling of wolves. Their hearts
were heavy, remembering the many men that had fallen in battle in this place.
 The road dipped between rising turf-banks, carving its way through the terraces to
the river's edge, and up again upon the further side. There were three lines of flat
stepping-stones across the stream, and between them fords for horses, that went
from either brink to a bare eyot in the midst. The riders looked down upon the
crossings, and it seemed strange to them; for the Fords had ever been a place full of
the rush and chatter of water upon stones; but now they were silent. The beds of the
stream were almost dry, a bare waste of shingles and grey sand.
 'This is become a dreary place,' said Eomer. 'What sickness has befallen the river?
Many fair things Saruman has destroyed: has he devoured the springs of Isen too?'
 'So it would seem,' said Gandalf.
 'Alas!' said Theoden. 'Must we pass this way, where the carrion-beasts devour so
many good Riders of the Mark?'
 'This is our way,' said Gandalf. 'Grievous is the fall of your men; but you shall see
that at least the wolves of the mountains do not devour them. It is with their friends,
the Orcs, that they hold their feast: such indeed is the friendship of their kind. Come!'
 They rode down to the river, and as they came the wolves ceased their howling
and slunk away. Fear fell on them seeing Gandalf in the moon, and Shadowfax his
horse shining like silver. The riders passed over to the islet, and glittering eyes
watched them wanly from the shadows of the banks.
 'Look!' said Gandalf. 'Friends have laboured here.'
 And they saw that in the midst of the eyot a mound was piled, ringed with stones,
and set about with many spears.
 101
 'Here lie all the Men of the Mark that fell near this place,' said Gandalf.
 'Here let them rest!' said Eomer. 'And when their spears have rotted and rusted,
long still may their mound stand and guard the Fords of Isen!'
 'Is this your work also, Gandalf, my friend?' said Theoden. 'You accomplished
much in an evening and a night!'
 'With the help of Shadowfax – and others,' said Gandalf. 'I rode fast and far. But
here beside the mound I will say this for your comfort: many fell in the battles of the
Fords, but fewer than rumour made them. More were scattered than were slain; I
gathered together all that I could find. Some men I sent with Grimbold of Westfold to
join Erkenbrand. Some I set to make this burial. They have now followed your
marshal, Elfhelm. I sent him with many Riders to Edoras. Saruman I knew had
despatched his full strength against you, and his servants had turned aside from all
other errands and gone to Helm's Deep: the lands seemed empty of enemies; yet I
feared that wolf-riders and plunderers might ride nonetheless to Meduseld, while it
was undefended. But now I think you need not fear: you will find your house to
welcome your return.'
 'And glad shall I be to see it again,' said Theoden, 'though brief now, I doubt not,
shall be my abiding there.'
 With that the company said farewell to the island and the mound, and passed over
the river, and climbed the further bank. Then they rode on, glad to have left the
mournful Fords. As they went the howling of the wolves broke out anew.
 There was an ancient highway that ran down from Isengard to the crossings. For
some way it took its course beside the river, bending with it east and then north; but
at the last it turned away and went straight towards the gates of Isengard; and these
were under the mountain-side in the west of the valley, sixteen miles or more from its
mouth. This road they followed but they did not ride upon it; for the ground beside it
was firm and level, covered for many miles about with short springing turf. They rode
now more swiftly, and by midnight the Fords were nearly five leagues behind. Then
they halted, ending their night's journey, for the King was weary. They were come to
the feet of the Misty Mountains, and the long arms of Nan Curunir stretched down to
meet them. Dark lay the vale before them, for the moon had passed into the West,
and its light was hidden by the hills. But out of the deep shadow of the dale rose a
vast spire of smoke and vapour; as it mounted, it caught the rays of the sinking
moon, and spread in shimmering billows, black and silver, over the starry sky.
 'What do you think of that, Gandalf?' asked Aragorn. 'One would say that all the
Wizard's Vale was burning.'
 'There is ever a fume above that valley in these days,' said Eomer, 'but I have
never seen aught like this before. These are steams rather than smokes. Saruman is
brewing some devilry to greet us. Maybe he is boiling all the waters of Isen, and that
is why the river runs dry.'
 'Maybe he is,' said Gandalf. 'Tomorrow we shall learn what he is doing. Now let us
rest for a while, if we can.'
 They camped beside the bed of the Isen river; it was still silent and empty. Some of
them slept a little. But late in the night the watchmen cried out, and all awoke. The
moon was gone. Stars were shining above; but over the ground there crept a
darkness blacker than the night. On both sides of the river it rolled towards them,
going northward.
 'Stay where you are!' said Gandalf. 'Draw no weapons! Wait! and it will pass you
by!'
 A mist gathered about them. Above them a few stars still glimmered faintly; but on
 102
either side there arose walls of impenetrable gloom; they were in a narrow lane
between moving towers of shadow. Voices they heard, whisperings and groanings
and an endless rustling sigh; the earth shook under them. Long it seemed to them
that they sat and were afraid; but at last the darkness and the rumour passed, and
vanished between the mountain's arms.
 Away south upon the Hornburg, in the middle night men heard a great noise, as a
wind in the valley, and the ground trembled; and all were afraid and no one ventured
to go forth. But in the morning they went out and were amazed; for the slain Orcs
were gone, and the trees also. Far down into the valley of the Deep the grass was
crushed and trampled brown, as if giant herdsmen had pastured great droves of
cattle there; but a mile below the Dike a huge pit had been delved in the earth, and
over it stones were piled into a hill. Men believed that the Orcs whom they had slain
were buried there; but whether those who had fled into the wood were with them,
none could say, for no man ever set foot upon that hill. The Death Down it was
afterwards called, and no grass would grow there. But the strange trees were never
seen in Deeping-coomb again; they had returned at night, and had gone far away to
the dark dales of Fangorn. Thus they were revenged upon the Orcs.
 The king and his company slept no more that night; but they saw and heard no
other strange thing, save one: the voice of the river beside them suddenly awoke.
There was a rush of water hurrying down among the stones; and when it had
passed, the Isen flowed and bubbled in its bed again, as it had ever done.
 At dawn they made ready to go on. The light came grey and pale, and they did not
see the rising of the sun. The air above was heavy with fog, and a reek lay on the
land about them. They went slowly, riding now upon the highway. It was broad and
hard, and well-tended. Dimly through the mists they could descry the long arm of the
mountains rising on their left. They had passed into Nan Curunir, the Wizard's Vale.
That was a sheltered valley, open only to the South. Once it had been fair and green,
and through it the Isen flowed, already deep and strong before it found the plains; for
it was fed by many springs and lesser streams among the rain-washed hills, and all
about it there had lain a pleasant, fertile land.
 It was not so now. Beneath the walls of Isengard there still were acres tilled by the
slaves of Saruman; but most of the valley had become a wilderness of weeds and
thorns. Brambles trailed upon the ground, or clambering over bush and bank, made
 103
shaggy caves where small beasts housed. No trees grew there; but among the rank
grasses could still be seen the burned and axe-hewn stumps of ancient groves. It
was a sad country, silent now but for the stony noise of quick waters. Smokes and
steams drifted in sullen clouds and lurked in the hollows. The riders did not speak.
Many doubted in their hearts, wondering to what dismal end their journey led.
 After they had ridden for some miles, the highway became a wide street, paved
with great flat stones, squared and laid with skill; no blade of grass was seen in any
joint. Deep gutters, filled with trickling water, ran down on either side. Suddenly a tall
pillar loomed up before them. It was black; and set upon it was a great stone, carved
and painted in the likeness of a long White Hand. Its finger pointed north. Not far
now they knew that the gates of Isengard must stand, and their hearts were heavy;
but their eyes could not pierce the mists ahead.
 Beneath the mountain's arm within the Wizard's Vale through years uncounted had
stood that ancient place that Men called Isengard. Partly it was shaped in the making
of the mountains, but mighty works the Men of Westernesse had wrought there of
old; and Saruman had dwelt there long and had not been idle.
 This was its fashion, while Saruman was at his height, accounted by many the
chief of Wizards. A great ring-wall of stone, like towering cliffs, stood out from the
shelter of the mountain-side, from which it ran and then returned again. One
entrance only was there made in it, a great arch delved in the southern wall. Here
through the black rock a long tunnel had been hewn, closed at either end with mighty
doors of iron. They were so wrought and poised upon their huge hinges, posts of
steel driven into the living stone, that when unbarred they could be moved with a
light thrust of the arms, noiselessly. One who passed in and came at length out of
the echoing tunnel, beheld a plain, a great circle, somewhat hollowed like a vast
shallow bowl: a mile it measured from rim to rim. Once it had been green and filled
with avenues, and groves of fruitful trees, watered by streams that flowed from the
mountains to a lake. But no green thing grew there in the latter days of Saruman.
The roads were paved with stone-flags, dark and hard; and beside their borders
instead of trees there marched long lines of pillars, some of marble, some of copper
and of iron. joined by heavy chains.
 Many houses there were, chambers, halls, and passages, cut and tunnelled back
into the walls upon their inner side, so that all the open circle was overlooked by
countless windows and dark doors. Thousands could dwell there, workers, servants,
slaves, and warriors with great store of arms; wolves were fed and stabled in deep
dens beneath. The plain, too, was bored and delved. Shafts were driven deep into
the ground; their upper ends were covered by low mounds and domes of stone, so
that in the moonlight the Ring of Isengard looked like a graveyard of unquiet dead.
For the ground trembled. The shafts ran down by many slopes and spiral stairs to
caverns far under; there Saruman had treasuries, store-houses, armouries, smithies,
and great furnaces. Iron wheels revolved there endlessly, and hammers thudded. At
night plumes of vapour steamed from the vents, lit from beneath with red light, or
blue, or venomous green.
 To the centre all the roads ran between their chains. There stood a tower of
marvellous shape. It was fashioned by the builders of old, who smoothed the Ring of
Isengard, and yet it seemed a thing not made by the craft of Men, but riven from the
bones of the earth in the ancient torment of the hills. A peak and isle of rock it was,
black and gleaming hard: four mighty piers of many-sided stone were welded into
one, but near the summit they opened into gaping horns. their pinnacles sharp as the
points of spears, keen-edged as knives. Between them was a narrow space, and
 104
there upon a floor of polished stone, written with strange signs, a man might stand
five hundred feet above the plain. This was Orthanc, the citadel of Saruman, the
name of which had (by design or chance) a twofold meaning; for in the Elvish speech
orthanc signifies Mount Fang, but in the language of the Mark of old the Cunning
Mind.
 A strong place and wonderful was Isengard, and long it had been beautiful; and
there great lords had dwelt, the wardens of Gondor upon the West, and wise men
that watched the stars. But Saruman had slowly shaped it to his shifting purposes,
and made it better, as he thought, being deceived – for all those arts and subtle
devices, for which he forsook his former wisdom, and which fondly he imagined were
his own, came but from Mordor; so that what he made was naught, only a little copy,
a child's model or a slave's flattery, of that vast fortress. Armoury, prison, furnace of
great power, Barad-dur, the Dark Tower, which suffered no rival, and laughed at
flattery, biding its time, secure in its pride and its immeasurable strength.
 This was the stronghold of Saruman, as fame reported it; for within living memory
the men of Rohan had not passed its gates, save perhaps a few, such as
Wormtongue, who came in secret and told no man what they saw.
 Now Gandalf rode to the great pillar of the Hand, and passed it: and as he did so
the Riders saw to their wonder that the Hand appeared no longer white. It was
stained as with dried blood; and looking closer they perceived that its nails were red.
Unheeding Gandalf rode on into the mist, and reluctantly they followed him. All about
them now, as if there had been a sudden flood, wide pools of water lay beside the
road, filling the hollows, and rills went trickling down among the stones.
 At last Gandalf halted and beckoned to them; and they came, and saw that beyond
him the mists had cleared, and a pale sunlight shone. The hour of noon had passed.
They were come to the doors of Isengard.
 But the doors lay hurled and twisted on the ground. And all about, stone, cracked
and splintered into countless jagged shards, was scattered far and wide, or piled in
ruinous heaps. The great arch still stood, but it opened now upon a roofless chasm:
the tunnel was laid bare, and through the cliff-like walls on either side great rents and
breaches had been torn; their towers were beaten into dust. If the Great Sea had
risen in wrath and fallen on the hills with storm, it could have worked no greater ruin.
 The ring beyond was filled with steaming water: a bubbling cauldron, in which there
heaved and floated a wreckage of beams and spars, chests and casks and broken
gear. Twisted and leaning pillars reared their splintered stems above the flood, but
all the roads were drowned. Far off, it seemed, half veiled in winding cloud, there
loomed the island rock. Still dark and tall, unbroken by the storm, the tower of
Orthanc stood. Pale waters lapped about its feet.
 The king and all his company sat silent on their horses, marvelling, perceiving that
the power of Saruman was overthrown; but how they could not guess. And now they
turned their eyes towards the archway and the ruined gates. There they saw close
beside them a great rubble-heap; and suddenly they were aware of two small figures
lying on it at their ease, grey-clad, hardly to be seen among the stones. There were
bottles and bowls and platters laid beside them, as if they had just eaten well, and
now rested from their labour. One seemed asleep; the other, with crossed legs and
arms behind his head, leaned back against a broken rock and sent from his mouth
long wisps and little rings of thin blue smoke.
 For a moment Theoden and Eomer and all his men stared at them in wonder. Amid
all the wreck of Isengard this seemed to them the strangest sight. But before the king
could speak, the small smoke-breathing figure became suddenly aware of them, as
 105
they sat there silent on the edge of the mist. He sprang to his feet. A young man he
looked, or like one, though not much more than half a man in height; his head of
brown curling hair was uncovered, but he was clad in a travel-stained cloak of the
same hue and shape as the companions of Gandalf had worn when they rode to
Edoras. He bowed very low, putting his hand upon his breast. Then, seeming not to
observe the wizard and his friends, he turned to Eomer and the king.
 'Welcome, my lords, to Isengard!' he said. 'We are the doorwardens. Meriadoc, son
of Saradoc is my name; and my companion, who, alas! is overcome with weariness'
– here he gave the other a dig with his foot – 'is Peregrin, son of Paladin, of the
house of Took. Far in the North is our home. The Lord Saruman is within; but at the
moment he is closeted with one Wormtongue, or doubtless he would be here to
welcome such honourable guests.'
 'Doubtless he would!' laughed Gandalf. 'And was it Saruman that ordered you to
guard his damaged doors, and watch for the arrival of guests, when your attention
could be spared from plate and bottle?'
 'No, good sir, the matter escaped him,' answered Merry gravely. 'He has been
much occupied. Our orders came from Treebeard, who has taken over the
management of Isengard. He commanded me to welcome the Lord of Rohan with
fitting words. I have done my best.'
 'And what about your companions? What about Legolas and me?' cried Gimli,
unable to contain himself longer. 'You rascals, you woolly-footed and wool-pated
truants! A fine hunt you have led us! Two hundred leagues, through fen and forest,
battle and death, to rescue you! And here we find you feasting and idling – and
smoking! Smoking! Where did you come by the weed, you villains? Hammer and
tongs! I am so torn between rage and joy, that if I do not burst, it will be a marvel!'
 'You speak for me, Gimli,' laughed Legolas. 'Though I would sooner learn how they
came by the wine.'
 'One thing you have not found in your hunting, and that's brighter wits,' said Pippin,
opening an eye. 'Here you find us sitting on a field of victory, amid the plunder of
armies, and you wonder how we came by a few well-earned comforts!'
 'Well-earned?' said Gimli. 'I cannot believe that!'
 The Riders laughed. 'It cannot be doubted that we witness the meeting of dear
friends,' said Theoden. 'So these are the lost ones of your company, Gandalf? The
days are fated to be filled with marvels. Already I have seen many since I left my
house; and now here before my eyes stand yet another of the folk of legend. Are not
these the Halflings, that some among us call the Holbytlan?'
 'Hobbits, if you please, lord,' said Pippin.
 'Hobbits?' said Theoden. 'Your tongue is strangely changed; but the name sounds
not unfitting so. Hobbits! No report that I have heard does justice to the truth.'
 Merry bowed; and Pippin got up and bowed low. 'You are gracious, lord; or I hope
that I may so take your words,' he said. 'And here is another marvel! I have
wandered in many lands, since I left my home, and never till now have I found
people that knew any story concerning hobbits.'
 'My people came out of the North long ago,' said Theoden. 'But I will not deceive
you: we know no tales about hobbits. All that is said among us is that far away, over
many hills and rivers, live the halfling folk that dwell in holes in sand-dunes. But there
are no legends of their deeds. for it is said that they do little, and avoid the sight of
men, being able to vanish in a twinkling: and they can change their voices to
resemble the piping of birds. But it seems that more could be said.'
 'It could indeed, lord,' said Merry.
 106
 'For one thing,' said Theoden, 'I had not heard that they spouted smoke from their
mouths.'
 'That is not surprising,' answered Merry; 'for it is an art which we have not practised
for more than a few generations. It was Tobold Hornblower, of Longbottom in the
Southfarthing, who first grew the true pipe-weed in his gardens, about the year 1070
according to our reckoning. How old Toby came by the plant…'
 'You do not know your danger, Theoden,' interrupted Gandalf. 'These hobbits will
sit on the edge of ruin and discuss the pleasures of the table, or the small doings of
their fathers, grandfathers, and great-grandfathers, and remoter cousins to the ninth
degree, if you encourage them with undue patience. Some other time would be more
fitting for the history of smoking. Where is Treebeard, Merry?'
 'Away on the north side, I believe. He went to get a drink of clean water. Most of
the other Ents are with him, still busy at their work – over there.' Merry waved his
hand towards the steaming lake; and as they looked, they heard a distant rumbling
and rattling, as if an avalanche was falling from the mountain-side. Far away came a
hoom-hom, as of horns blowing triumphantly.
 'And is Orthanc then left unguarded?' asked Gandalf.
 'There is the water,' said Merry. 'But Quickbeam and some others are watching it.
Not all those posts and pillars in the plain are of Saruman's planting. Quickbeam, I
think, is by the rock, near the foot of the stair.'
 'Yes, a tall grey Ent is there,' said Legolas, 'but his arms are at his sides, and he
stands as still as a door-tree.'
 'It is past noon,' said Gandalf, 'and we at any rate have not eaten since early
morning. Yet I wish to see Treebeard as soon as may be. Did he leave me no
message, or has plate and bottle driven it from your mind?'
 'He left a message,' said Merry, 'and I was coming to it, but I have been hindered
by many other questions. I was to say that, if the Lord of the Mark and Gandalf will
ride to the northern wall they will find Treebeard there, and he will welcome them. I
may add that they will also find food of the best there, it was discovered and selected
by your humble servants.' He bowed.
 Gandalf laughed. 'That is better!' he said. 'Well, Theoden, will you ride with me to
find Treebeard? We must go round about, but it is not far. When you see Treebeard,
you will learn much. For Treebeard is Fangorn, and the eldest and chief of the Ents,
and when you speak with him you will hear the speech of the oldest of all living
things.'
 'I will come with you,' said Theoden. 'Farewell, my hobbits! May we meet again in
my house! There you shall sit beside me and tell me all that your hearts desire: the
deeds of your grandsires, as far as you can reckon them; and we will speak also of
Tobold the Old and his herb-lore. Farewell!'
 The hobbits bowed low. 'So that is the King of Rohan!' said Pippin in an undertone.
'A fine old fellow. Very polite.' 
